date,description,descripton,keywords,link,location,title
2018-11-15,,"Job description
At Datadog, we're on a mission to build the best platform in the world for engineers to understand and scale their systems, applications, and teams. We operate at high scale—trillions of data points per day—providing always-on alerting, metrics visualization, logs, and application tracing for tens of thousands of companies. Our engineering culture values pragmatism, honesty, and simplicity to solve hard problems the right way.

We are looking for great students to join us for an internship to help us collect, aggregate, visualize, and analyze extremely high-scale metrics, logs, and application data.

The Opportunity

We're looking for talented frontend and backend developers to join our teams and start making an impact from day one. You'll join one of Datadog's software teams and work alongside other engineers to help solve challenging problems. Whether you are writing a new integration, building data pipelines, or working with the open source community, our interns are key contributors to our product.

Your Skills And Qualifications
You are in the process of receiving a degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related discipline
You have solid experience with a couple of programming languages
You can take complex ideas and distill them into simple, working code
You’re curious and want to learn more
You have strong computer science fundamentals (data structures, algorithms, software design, to name a few)
You’ve coded something real. Send us a link to one of your apps, websites, or open source libraries

Bonus Points
You are fluent in Python, Go, Ruby, Java or Javascript
You have some specialized skills, like data visualization or distributed systems engineering
You’ve used Datadog or have written your own monitoring tools before",software intern python,https://www.datadoghq.com/careers/detail/?gh_jid=672473,New York,Software Engineer - Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Bloomberg software engineers develop impactful solutions to complex, real-world problems. This is no different for our interns. Engineering interns take ownership of their projects under the mentorship of full-time software engineers. We are looking for top computer science students who are passionate about technology and eager to learn in our high energy, fast-paced environment.

As an intern, you'll become an expert on the Bloomberg Terminal and gain a deeper understanding of technology and finance. In addition to your projects, you'll participate in coding challenges, attend tech talks and network with other interns.

We'll trust you to:

* Take ownership of projects under the guidance of your mentor
* Be a collaborative member of your team
* Have a deep understanding of data structures and algorithms
* Be an excellent problem solver
You'll need to:

* Have programming experience in C, C++, Java or Python
* Have a minimum GPA of 3.0
* Be working toward a BA, BS, MS or PhD in Computer Science

If this sounds like you, please apply below!",software intern python,https://careers.bloomberg.com/job/detail/68834?utm_medium=Bayard&utm_source=LinkedIn,New York,2019 Software Engineer Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Firm Overview:
Schonfeld Strategic Advisors LLC, an SEC-registered investment adviser, is a multi-manager platform that invests its capital with both internal and external / partner portfolio managers, primarily on a long-term, exclusive basis, across statistical arbitrage and other quantitatively-driven strategies, fundamental equity strategies, and tactical trading strategies. Schonfeld has created a unique structure to provide global portfolio managers with autonomy, flexibility and significant support to best enable them to maximize the value of their businesses. Over the last 30 years, Schonfeld and its predecessors have successfully invested in and supported hundreds of portfolio managers. Schonfeld develops and invests heavily in proprietary technology, infrastructure, and risk analytics. Schonfeld’s portfolio exposure has expanded across the Americas, Europe and Asia, as well as among multiple asset classes and products.
  Summer Program Overview:
We are seeking a team of software engineers to spend ten weeks in our New York-based office where you will be immersed in the culture and atmosphere of Schonfeld, working alongside experienced professionals. Interns will learn about Microservices based frameworks, Python and Java-based services deployed on AWS and how we as a firm use technology to solve business problems. Interns will be managed by an energetic leader and also be provided an individual mentor. They will participate in organized team-building events, lunch and learns, social activities, and networking with various members of the firm and senior management throughout the summer. The team of interns will present their project at the completion of the program and may be extended a full-time offer of employment.
  Work Experience Requirements/Preferences:
·       Demonstrated software engineering skills from previous internships, coding competitions, or publications
·       Familiar with programming languages like Java, C++, or Python and excited to pick up new languages (we use AWS, Microservices, etc)
·       High levels of creativity and quick problem solving capabilities
·       Interest in Capital Markets or Finance
·       Computer Science students graduating in 2019/2020",software intern python,https://boards.greenhouse.io/schonfeld/jobs/1402353?gh_src=eba66f0b1,New York,Software Engineer Intern (Summer 2019)
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Comcast brings together the best in media and technology. We drive innovation to create the world's best entertainment and online experiences. As a Fortune 50 leader, we set the pace in a variety of innovative and fascinating businesses and create career opportunities across a wide range of locations and disciplines. We are at the forefront of change and move at an amazing pace, thanks to our remarkable people, who bring cutting-edge products and services to life for millions of customers every day. If you share in our passion for teamwork, our vision to revolutionize industries and our goal to lead the future in media and technology, we want you to fast-forward your career at Comcast.

Job Summary

The Comcast Technology Internship Program is an 11-week summer program designed to identify high-caliber talent to build our organization with the best and the brightest students.

Over the course of the summer, your experience will include:
Engagement: Working on creative, innovative, and thought-provoking projects within various business units at Comcast during your internship experience.
Exposure: An inside look into the day-to-day operations of an organization at the cutting edge of media and technology.
Professional development: You will be exposed to a variety of professional development topics facilitated through our partners at Comcast University and senior leaders within the organization. These sessions are inclusive of speaker series, skill-building workshops, and networking opportunities.
Mentorship: Mentoring from fellow colleagues through the Empowering Future Leaders Program (EFLP) to help you navigate your experience, provide coaching, and expand your professional network.
Fun: Continuously develop relationships with fellow interns through social activities, community building, and networking.
Department And Position Overview

FreeWheel helps the television industry generate revenue from their premium content through a robust technology platform, which enables consumers to watch entertainment on any devices from PC, mobile, set-top box to traditional TV. FreeWheel's New York Engineering Team is part of a global engineering group that is building advanced and high quality applications, servers and tools to manage million dollar orders, handle billions of daily requests, and process terabytes of raw daily data.

Employees At All Levels Are Expected To
Understand our Operating Principles; make them the guidelines for how you do your job
Own the customer experience-think and act in ways that put our customers first, give them seamless digital options at every touchpoint, and make them promoters of our products and services
Know your stuff-be enthusiastic learners, users and advocates of our game-changing technology, products and services, especially our digital tools and experiences
Win as a team-make big things happen by working together and being open to new ideas
Be an active part of the Net Promoter System-a way of working that brings more employee and customer feedback into the company-by joining huddles, making call backs and helping us elevate opportunities to do better for our customers
Drive results and growth
Respect and promote inclusion and diversity
Do what's right for each other, our customers, investors and our communities
Core Responsibilities
Work with different teams to design technical data storage and processing solutions
Work with data scientists to create efficient and scalable data pipelines in AWS for data modeling
Design, develop, and test data-driven workflows
Improve performance, availability and scalability of our backend systems
Job Specification
Currently pursuing a Bachelor's or Master's degree from a United States-based college or university
Majors: Computer Science, Software Engineering or a related field
3.0 GPA or higher
Skilled with Scala or Python
Proficient with Linux commands and environments
Proficient with Hadoop/Spark/Kafka/Presto/etc
Experiences with data processing or analysis systems is strongly preferred
Experiences with AWS or other Cloud technology are strongly preferred
Known for being a smart, analytical thinker who approaches their work with logic and enthusiasm
Detail oriented, flexible and can work well in a global team-oriented environment
Proven analytical, organizational, and problem-solving ability
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work independently and in group settings
Strong interest in the technology, telecommunications, cable and media industries
Current and future authorization to work in the United States of America
Comcast is an EOE/Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer",software intern python,,New York,"FW Intern Software Engineer, Big Data"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Yext is the leading Digital Knowledge Management (DKM) platform. Yext's mission is to give companies control over their brand experiences across the digital universe of maps, apps, search engines, voice assistants, and other intelligent services that drive consumer discovery, decision, and action. Today, thousands of businesses including brands like Taco Bell, Rite Aid, and Steward Health use the Yext Knowledge Engine™ to manage their digital knowledge in order to boost brand engagement, drive foot traffic, and increase sales.

The Yext engineering team drives the technology behind our revolutionary product offering! In addition to working hands-on with code from day one, you will work alongside engineers from top universities and tech companies. Our team works in an agile environment running two-week sprints that culminate with demos of features in progress. We rely heavily on Java but believe in using the right technology for each unique challenge. You will play an important role on our team, have a huge impact on the company, and learn a TON.

The ideal candidate will have some non-curricular related experience in software development, preferably web development.

Responsibilities
Participate in full software lifecycle including design, implementation, and deployment
Develop highly scalable systems using a variety of languages and technologies
Deliver software against an aggressive schedule


Minimum Requirements
Pursuing a degree in Computer Science or related technical field, graduating between December 2019 and August 2021
Excellent implementation skills (C++, Java, Python)
Fast learner who picks up new technologies quickly
Ability to work productively in a collaborative team environment
Effective time-management skills and the ability to juggle multiple projects


Compensation, Benefits & Perks

Yext offers the following exceptional benefits: competitive compensation, unlimited snacks, and a daily meal allowance. We treat our employees well and offer tremendous growth opportunities. Challenging work pushes our people to be creative in a casual environment that is caring, fun, and collaborative. We believe that when you have smart, happy people working together you can produce something special.

About

Yext has been named a Best Place to Work by Fortune and Great Place to Work® as well as a Best Workplace for Women. Yext is headquartered in New York City with offices in Berlin, Chicago, Dallas, Geneva, London, Paris, Tyson's Corner, San Francisco, Shanghai, and Tokyo. Learn more about the Yext team and culture on the muse, our website, and our blog.

Yext is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, creed, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, national origin, disability, age, genetic information, or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.",software intern python,,New York,2019 Software Engineer Summer Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As a member of our internship program, you will have the unique opportunity to work alongside an exceptional group of technologists while developing hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment. Your growth and success are paramount to us: You'll have the direct guidance and mentorship of one of our experienced engineers, and will be matched with a team that best suits your interests. We'll make sure that you have a thorough understanding of the different types of problems we're solving; so that you can work on projects that not only excite you, but drive meaningful, real-world impact.

Oscar engineering builds industry-leading software that aims to transform the healthcare experience. We work on high-impact projects across our front-end, mobile, platform, and data teams; building rich web applications, product backends and services and the infrastructure that supports it all.

Our products and platform are built primarily in Python, JavaScript, Java, Objective C and Go.

Typical Projects Include
Interactive care router using React and Google Maps, backed by a healthcare guidance engine based on NLP techniques
Building easy-to-understand interfaces for our internal teams that aggregate and distill complex data sets
Ingestion of health events via a real-time data pipeline, and a timeline to let members view their health history including doctor's appointments, lab results, prescriptions, etc
Building and improving the software infrastructure we run on: cluster management, service discovery, continuous integration
Android and iOS apps for members to access their health information on the go and track their fitness activity
Who You Are
Excited to take part in reinventing healthcare
Have experience developing rich applications with HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript, or
Have experience in a systems language like Java, C++, or Go, and a scripting language like Python or Ruby
Want to work closely with product and design teams
We look forward to hearing from you!

At Oscar, being an Equal Opportunity Employer means more than upholding discrimination-free hiring practices. It means that we work to cultivate an environment where exceptional people can be their most authentic selves and find both belonging and support. We're on a mission to change healthcare -- an experience made whole by your unique background and perspectives.

Oscar applicants are considered solely based on their qualifications, without regard to applicant's disability or need for accommodation. Any Oscar applicant who requires reasonable accommodations during the application process should contact the Oscar Benefits Team (accommodations@hioscar.com) to make the need for an accommodation known.

Pay Transparency Policy: Oscar's Pay Transparency Policy ensures that you won't be discharged or discriminated against based on whether you've inquired about, discussed, or disclosed your pay. Read the full policy here.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/211cdc7f30577627236a58e5904d34d6,New York,Software Engineer: Intern 2019 - Web & Mobile
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Teledyne LeCroy Inc., located in Chestnut Ridge, NY (Rockland County, NY), is a high tech leading manufacturer of high performance electronic test and measurement equipment. We are looking for a talented, highly motivated software engineering student to intern to work with us May-August 2019 at our headquarters located in Chestnut Ridge, NY (Rockland County).

Position Summary And Responsibilities

As a Software Engineering Intern, you would be part of a team developing and testing software for use with digital oscilloscopes and other test equipment, geared toward specific customer applications, such as serial data physical layer compliance, automotive serial data testing, power analysis, and more. Your responsibilities will focus around QA activities, including developing and documenting software test procedures, testing software for product release, developing and maintaining regression test software, and debugging and updating code.

Requirements

Qualifications
Engineering student working towards Bachelors or Masters in Software Engineering, Computer Science, or Electrical Engineering
Proficient in the use/working knowledge of Python
Have a deep understanding of data structures and algorithms
Ability to write test procedures and work instructions
Strong analytical and creative problem-solving skills
The individual must have excellent communications skills, both verbal and writtenAdditional skills/knowledge a plus:
Programming knowledge in C++, Matlab
Experience in test equipment automation
Knowledge of PC operating systems and PC system hardware components
Teledyne is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, transgender, pregnancy, marital status, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, disability, protected Veteran Status, genetics or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

If you need assistance or an accommodation while seeking employment, please email teledynerecruitment@teledyne.com or call (805)373-4545. Determinations on requests for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will receive a response.",software intern python,https://neuvoo.com/view/?id=mvgz5ejcqc&source=linkedin&utm_source=partner&utm_medium=linkedin&puid=fad3a9da7ad9e9d67ddbfadbead6caddb9dffadd3ee3cdcgfec3dc&splitab=1&action=emailAlert,New York,Software Engineer Intern - Chestnut Ridge
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Kitware, Inc. is actively seeking Computer Vision Software Development Interns to join our Computer Vision group at our Clifton Park, NY headquarters. Kitware conducts cutting-edge research in computer vision and has extensive expertise in developing robust solutions for challenging problems involving complex real-world data. More information about Kitware and the Computer Vision group can be found from the following link: http://www.kitware.com/solutions/computervision/computervision.htm

Interns will focus on contributing high-quality software and building exciting large-scale infrastructure for computer vision. This includes using existing software and contributing new software to aid in the development and testing of computer vision systems.

Project Areas
Visualization: Development of tools and techniques for visualizing computer vision results.
Testing Infrastructure: Improve quality control by developing software testing infrastructure (using CMake, CTest, etc.) and writing test cases for code.
Experiments: Run existing algorithms on large-scale datasets with various parameter settings, collect and organize results.
Annotations: Develop and operate tools to label objects, activities, and events that appear in images and video. These labels are used to test and train computer vision algorithms.

Qualifications
Education: BS or MS students in related fields, including computer science, computer engineering, electrical engineering, and applied mathematics. Advanced high school students may also be considered.
Background: Knowledge or experience in computer vision and/or deep learning is a plus, but is not strictly required.
Languages: Proficiency in C++ and/or Python.

Additional Information

Kitware’s Computer Vision group is distributed between our two offices in Clifton Park near Albany, NY, and Carrboro near Chapel Hill, NC. Interns at the Clifton Park headquarters will enjoy visiting beautiful and vibrant areas including the Adirondack Mountains, entertaining Lake George region, and historic Saratoga Springs. There are numerous outdoor music concerts and festivals during summer in the area. Compensation is competitive and work schedules are flexible within an open atmosphere which encourages collaboration.

Kitware actively subscribes to a policy of equal employment opportunity. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, protected veteran status, uniformed service member status, or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.",software intern python,https://hire.withgoogle.com/public/jobs/kitwarecom/view/P_AAAAAADAAEiJxhTCJBd51E,New York,Computer Vision Software Developer Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As an intern working in Data, you’ll sit with a cross-functional team of software engineers, data scientists, and business analysts, working closely with your team to turn complex sources into valuable insights. Our projects improve the efficiency and amplify the effectiveness of other teams through data services and applications. We’re responsible for many different datasets and utilize a variety of data pipelines and tools, so we will customize your internship around your interests and skills. You’ll be working on a team where constant learning and team-wide knowledge sharing is a core part of our culture.

Our data engineering work here at Squarespace is divided into two areas:

Data Engineering
You’ll work directly with data scientists and analysts to help solve problems with data.
You’ll work with our data warehouse and ETL systems that ingest data impacting marketing, business metrics and reporting, product research and long term decisions impacting the company.

Data Platforms
You’ll work directly with engineers and data scientists to improve the efficiency and amplify the effectiveness of other teams through data services and applications.
You’ll work with streaming systems that ingest hundreds of millions of event records per day and batch systems built on top of hundreds of terabytes of data.


Responsibilities
Work closely with other engineers, building high quality solutions and data processing services for an internal customer
Participate as a regular member of a team of engineers. You’ll contribute to code reviews, technical discussions, and attend regular team meetings.
Communicate with engineers, analysts and other stakeholders to lead development of solutions
Learn new data stores, ETL tools, and other technologies as needed


Qualifications
Currently pursuing a BS or MS in Computer Science, Engineering, or related technical discipline
A foundation in computer science with competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design practices
Experience with python and data stores such as Postgresql, MongoDB and HDFS
Curiosity about how a technology company builds software for itself
You're motivated and driven. You naturally take responsibility for a project and ask for help when needed.


About Squarespace

Squarespace makes beautiful products to help people with creative ideas succeed. By blending elegant design and sophisticated engineering, we empower millions of people — from individuals and local artists to entrepreneurs shaping the world’s most iconic businesses — to share their stories with the world. Squarespace’s team of more than 750 is headquartered in downtown New York City, with offices in Dublin and Portland. For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.

Today, more than a million people around the globe use Squarespace to share different perspectives and experiences with the world. Not only do we embrace and celebrate the diversity of our customer base, but we also strive for the same in our employees. At Squarespace, we are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender, gender identity or expression, or veteran status. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",software intern python,https://www.squarespace.com/careers/jobs/953871,New York,Software Engineer Intern - Data
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Description

IBM CIO (Chief Information Office) Organization is looking for innovative talent for our Boston area locations who bring fresh new ideas to create a productive environment for all IBMers across the globe through our internship program offering. Our mission is to provide the best work experience in a digital workplace to all IBM employees and consequently positively impact on the way IBM deliver what our clients need.

Are you interested in working in an innovative and collaborative environment for the summer? If so, this is your chance to work in the first IBM area to become agile and to create meaningful solutions that impact our technology and business transformation for a new business era - all in just one summer!

Software Developer’s have passion and experience for building responsive, elegant and engaging experiences with future friendly web technologies. Developers will lead the conversation about the various devices a person will use when engaging with our products. They will collaborate on the overall design, creating prototypes to explore and demonstrate nuanced interaction patterns; which will influence or be the frameworks used for applications.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
Minimum of 1-year experience in programming and software development using at least two programming languages, preferably Java, C++, Python, Node.js and/or R
Knowledge of Object-Oriented Programming constructs and design principles
Knowledge of development and deployment on a cloud-based environment like IBM BlueMix, AWS, Azure, etc.
Minimum of 1-year experience using problem solving skills such as: Analyze causes using existing techniques or tools, prepare and recommend solution alternatives
Ability to collaborate with others
Ability to challenge the validity of given procedures & processes with the intent to enhance and improve
Demonstrated experience in working with business leaders to design solutions
Enrolled in a Bachelor of Science in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Computer Information Technology, Management Information Systems or a similar degree program
Ability to work in the United States without the need for current or future IBM sponsorship

Preferred Tech And Prof Experience
Experience using Agile and DevOps methodologies
Experience with blockchain design and development
Experience with other programming languages

EO Statement
IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.",software intern python,https://careers.ibm.com/ShowJob/Id/379952/Software%20Developer%20Intern%20Coop%20%20%20Boston%20Area,New York,Software Developer Intern/Coop - Boston Area
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Join us to do the best work of your life.

At frog we are united by our shared passion for outcomes that transform the human experience. We accomplish these outcomes by taking on complex challenges, big asks, and things that have never been done before. We look beyond point solutions and apply design to the creation of new strategies, systems, and—in some cases—entirely new businesses. We know that takes all types of people. We believe that diverse backgrounds and experiences creates a stronger frog.

Our work is transformational because our people are extraordinary. frogs are analytical and artistic, conservative and unconventional, technical and whimsical. We look for hybrid talents and build teams around divergent expertise, which allows us to solve problems and uncover opportunities in unique ways. frogs are some of the best talent in the world, and together we advance the human experience through design.

The Position: Design Technologist Intern

Winter Design Technologist Intern – New York Studio

Start Date: 1/28/19

End Date: 4/5/19

We are looking for exceptional interns to join our creative teams. Interns are treated like full time employees in the studio and work on active programs with project teams. The winter internships are paid and run for 10 weeks.

For an application to be considered, please submit the following documents:
Resume
Cover Letter
Portfolio or Github URL


The Contribution

Intern Design Technologists at frog play the role of part futurist and part pragmatist while being a hands-on and organizer of technical insights, experiments, proofs, and models that bridge the gap between creative design services and software architecture and engineering as part of the successful delivery of innovative solutions for our clients. As a Design Technologist Intern, you will be assisting in driving technology platform research and experimentation, concept exploration, prototyping, and ideation within the creative process for designing user experiences in software. You will help to identify and analyze current and future UX technology patterns and trends, perform in-depth investigation and experimentation with emerging platforms and frameworks, and identify new opportunities and business value for UX innovation and differentiation with technology enablers. You collaborate closely with the creative organization to express design assets and artifacts in the form of user experience simulations, interactive prototypes, technical proof-of-concepts, and UI/presentation layer.

You are a maker and a tinkerer. You are not afraid to get your hands dirty, and you like challenges. You are creative, and technology is your medium.

You Are

Someone who wants to influence your own development. You’re looking for a company where you have the opportunity to pursue your interests across functions and geographies, and where a job title is not considered the final definition of who you are, but the starting point. You bring to the organization the following competencies:
Currently enrolled in a relevant degree seeking program (either graduate or undergraduate)
A dedicated and talented technologist who understands the value of design and future-thinking.
Detail oriented, hard working, self motivated, and proactive
Understanding of :
User interface design, user experience and information architecture
Fundamentals of computer science, data structures, and algorithms
Software design patterns, principals and best practices
Iterative prototyping and/or product realization
You are comfortable in one or more of the following areas:
Frontend HTML5 web development (JS/CSS/HTML). Full stack experience is a huge plus.
Databases and data manipulation
Mobile development (iOS and/or Android)
Creative coding for a screen in C++, Python, or your language of choice.
Physical computing, basic electronic prototyping
Data science and machine learning",software intern python,https://www.frogdesign.com/careers/jobs/1421652?gh_jid=1421652,New York,Design Technologist Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Description

Software Engineers create next generation software solutions to support business areas across the firm. Software Engineers work closely with business leaders to develop and deliver custom software solutions that optimize performance and efficiency. You’ll get to apply and hone your engineering skills in a structured program that allows you to work side-by-side with, and learn from, those who are thriving in this exciting and growing field.

Your Objectives
Design, develop, test, and deploy elegant software solutions across the firm
Partner with business leaders to define priorities and deliver custom solutions


Your Skills & Talents
A deep passion for technology and software development
Experience with some of the following: Distributed Computing, Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Platform Development, Networking, System Design, and/or Web Development
Bachelor’s, Master’s or PhD degree in Computer Science or equivalent experience
Strong written and verbal communications skills
Proficiency within one or more programming languages including C, C++, Python, R, C# or JavaScript


Opportunities available in Chicago and New York

About Citadel Securities

Citadel Securities is a leading global market maker across a broad array of fixed income and equity securities. Our world-class capabilities position us to meet the liquidity demands of our diverse group of institutional clients in all market conditions. In partnering with us, our clients, including asset managers, banks, broker-dealers, hedge funds, government agencies and public pension programs are able to gain a powerful trading advantage and are better positioned to meet their investment goals.

The team makes its mark every day from our offices around the world: Chicago, New York, London, Hong Kong, Toronto, Shanghai, Sydney, Dublin.

Apply Now",software intern python,https://www.citadelsecurities.com/careers/details/software-engineer-intern-all-locations/,New York,Software Engineer – Intern (All Locations)
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As a member of our internship program, you will have the unique opportunity to work alongside an exceptional group of technologists while developing hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment. Your growth and success are paramount to us: You'll have the direct guidance and mentorship of one of our experienced engineers, and will be matched with a team that best suits your interests. We'll make sure that you have a thorough understanding of the different types of problems we're solving; so that you can work on projects that not only excite you, but drive meaningful, real-world impact.

Oscar engineering builds industry-leading software that aims to transform the healthcare experience. We work on high-impact projects across our front-end, mobile, platform, and data teams; building rich web applications, product backends and services and the infrastructure that supports it all.

Our products and platform are built primarily in Python, JavaScript, Java, Objective C and Go.

Typical Projects Include
Interactive care router using React and Google Maps, backed by a healthcare guidance engine based on NLP techniques
Building easy-to-understand interfaces for our internal teams that aggregate and distill complex data sets
Ingestion of health events via a real-time data pipeline, and a timeline to let members view their health history including doctor's appointments, lab results, prescriptions, etc
Building and improving the software infrastructure we run on: cluster management, service discovery, continuous integration
Android and iOS apps for members to access their health information on the go and track their fitness activity


Who You Are
Excited to take part in reinventing healthcare
Have experience developing rich applications with HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript, or
Have experience in a systems language like Java, C++, or Go, and a scripting language like Python or Ruby
Want to work closely with product and design teams

We look forward to hearing from you!

At Oscar, being an Equal Opportunity Employer means more than upholding discrimination-free hiring practices. It means that we work to cultivate an environment where exceptional people can be their most authentic selves and find both belonging and support. We're on a mission to change healthcare -- an experience made whole by your unique background and perspectives.

Oscar applicants are considered solely based on their qualifications, without regard to applicant's disability or need for accommodation. Any Oscar applicant who requires reasonable accommodations during the application process should contact the Oscar Benefits Team (accommodations@hioscar.com) to make the need for an accommodation known.

Pay Transparency Policy: Oscar's Pay Transparency Policy ensures that you won't be discharged or discriminated against based on whether you've inquired about, discussed, or disclosed your pay. Read the full policy here.",software intern python,https://www.hioscar.com/careers/1318963?gh_jid=1318963&gh_src=8c282ec11,New York,Software Engineer: Intern 2019 - Web & Mobile
2018-11-15,,"Job description
BAE Systems is seeking a software engineering intern to provide development support on a variety of research projects. Work will focus on application of Machine Learning applications in the areas of cyber, autonomous command and control, cloud infrastructure/analytics and cross domain innovation and research. The intern will work with our team of software engineers and machine learning practitioners to develop solutions critical to our customers in completing their mission. Due to the R&D focus of our customer set, technologies frequently change between projects and individual projects encompass multiple technologies. Frequently, however, the development languages of choice are Java, Scala and JavaScript. Python is a plus. Candidate need not have experience in all of these languages. The successful candidate should be able to analyze a problem space and recommend the appropriate technologies and algorithms needed to develop effective solutions.

Software development experience
Java/JavaScript programming experience
Unix/Linux experience
Interest in Machine Learning or Data Analytics
Pursuing Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics or relevant area (completed Junior year as of May 2018)
Motivated individual with strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong communication and teamwork skills
U.S. citizenship
Eligible for security clearance
Experience with common machine learning frameworks (Tensorflow, Caffe, Torch, DL4J, etc.)
Familiarity with Amazon Web Services
Familiarity with Agile Development Methodologies
User Interface Design/Development experience
Experience with Python
BAE Systems Intelligence & Security, based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we do-from intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels. That's BAE Systems. That's Inspired Work.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Females/Minorities/Veterans/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Gender Expression. To see Inspired Work in action, visit www.baesystems.com and follow us on Facebook: www.facebook.com/baesystemsintel.",software intern python,https://jobs.baesystems.com/global/en,New York,Technical Intern - Software Engineering (Summer 2019)
2018-11-15,,"Job description
It Is Composed Of Tools And Processes Falling Under 4 Pillars

The Developer Platform aims to empower WeWork to build better products faster.
Provide best-of-breed resources and processes to empower WeWork to rapidly build and operate applications and infrastructure.
Provide software engineers with an end-to-end development tool set enabling quality agile continuous delivery of software.
Eliminate the gap between squads (engineers / product managers) and their production workloads via tools and actionable metrics.
Provide powerful data analysis and debugging tools for squads to improve their products.

We are looking for passionate interns that are motivated to learn in a fast-paced environment with a highly collaborative team. Strong problem solving skills, thinking outside the box and dealing with ambiguity are skills that we value.

WeWork Mission

WeWork is the platform for creators, providing hundreds of thousands of members around the world with space, community and services that enable them to do what they love and create their life's work. Our mission is to create a world where people work to make a life, not just a living, and our own team members are central to that goal.

Responsibilities
You’ll work with the Developer Platform team to solve challenges at scale.
You’ll be writing code consumed by hundreds of engineers around the world, enabling rapid delivery of software features.
You’ll interact with our engineering organization as a software engineer, learning how we develop code from concept to production. This includes writing, testing, deploying, monitoring, and more.


Requirements
Currently in your Junior year of a BS in Computer Science or equivalent
Experience coding in at least one language (Java, C++, Python, Ruby, JavaScript, etc.)
Interest in developer productivity
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills
Strong communication skills
Ability to work both independently and in groups
Ability to prioritize and set goals on shifting priorities",software intern python,https://careers.wework.com/job/WEWOUS3077/Software-Engineering-Summer-Intern-Developer-Platform?jobsource=recruitics&rx_cid=3006&gh_src=hc1nw5872&rx_campaign=Linkedin1&rx_group=108745&rx_job=4110998002&rx_medium=post&rx_source=Linkedin,New York,Software Engineering Summer Intern - Developer Platform
2018-11-15,,"Job description
This job has been posted by Stella.ai on behalf of one of our clients.
Our client is the leading Digital Knowledge Management (DKM) platform. Our client's mission is to give companies control over their brand experiences across the digital universe of maps, apps, search engines, voice assistants, and other intelligent services that drive consumer discovery, decision, and action. Today, thousands of businesses including brands like Taco Bell, Rite Aid, and Steward Health use the Our client Knowledge Engine™ to manage their digital knowledge in order to boost brand engagement, drive foot traffic, and increase sales.

The Our client engineering team drives the technology behind our revolutionary product offering! In addition to working hands-on with code from day one, you will work alongside engineers from top universities and tech companies. Our team works in an agile environment running two-week sprints that culminate with demos of features in progress. We rely heavily on Java but believe in using the right technology for each unique challenge. You will play an important role on our team, have a huge impact on the company, and learn a TON.

The ideal candidate will have some non-curricular related experience in software development, preferably web development.

Responsibilities
Participate in full software lifecycle including design, implementation, and deployment
Develop highly scalable systems using a variety of languages and technologies
Deliver software against an aggressive schedule


Minimum Requirements
Pursuing a degree in Computer Science or related technical field, graduating between December 2019 and August 2021
Excellent implementation skills (C++, Java, Python)
Fast learner who picks up new technologies quickly
Ability to work productively in a collaborative team environment
Effective time-management skills and the ability to juggle multiple projects


Compensation, Benefits & Perks

Our client offers the following exceptional benefits: competitive compensation, unlimited snacks, and a daily meal allowance. We treat our employees well and offer tremendous growth opportunities. Challenging work pushes our people to be creative in a casual environment that is caring, fun, and collaborative. We believe that when you have smart, happy people working together you can produce something special.

About

Our client has been named a Best Place to Work by Fortune and Great Place to Work® as well as a Best Workplace for Women. Our client is headquartered in New York City with offices in Berlin, Chicago, Dallas, Geneva, London, Paris, Tyson's Corner, San Francisco, Shanghai, and Tokyo. Learn more about the Our client team and culture on the muse, our website, and our blog.

Our client is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, creed, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, national origin, disability, age, genetic information, or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.",software intern python,https://www.stella.ai/jobs/Hpype3YpwRabAFAae7MHLd?company=lip&co=yext,New York,2019 Software Engineer Summer Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
At ACV Auctions, you have the opportunity to be a part of the fast-growing automotive technology company. Our team is pioneering new technology and end to end service for the automotive industry. We are committed to making ACV Auctions a leader in the automotive wholesale industry. ACV is positioned to re-engineer the way the automobile industry buys and sells used vehicles. Our employees benefit from a relaxed yet intense entrepreneurial work environment with the chance to be part of a “ground floor” opportunity having an impact on the company’s results from day one and grow as ACV Auctions does.

What is the Software Engineering role?

We are looking for Software Engineering Interns, across mobile, web, and infrastructure. You will be working alongside other engineers and developers working on different layers of the infrastructure. Therefore, commitment to collaborative problem solving, sophisticated design, and creating quality products is essential.

Responsibilities
Work closely with our product and engineering teams to develop the future of ACV Auctions.
Design, build, test, and maintain high performance, reusable, and reliable code.
Contribute software best practices and technology to the development and maintenance of our applications.


Qualifications
Pursuing a degree in Computer Science or a related field
Must be currently enrolled in a degree program and returning to the program after the completion of the internship
Experience in Java, Perl, or Python
Have prior experience from hackathons, school projects, internships, or equivalent
Great problem solving skills and ability to work in a fast paced startup environment",software intern python,https://acvauctions.bamboohr.com/jobs/view.php?id=651,New York,Software Engineering Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
The purpose of this internship is to prepare college juniors and seniors for entry into the business world by providing a thorough understanding of the various functions of the Zebra Technologies organization to include theory and practical application of attained knowledge.
Project work will differ in each area depending on business needs, and all interns will participate in the US Zebra Internship Program. The program is designed to provide you with a full experience so that you can fully envision a career with Zebra. You be positioned for success with training, exposure to all parts of the business, social activities, a professional mentor relationship and development sessions to help you discover your own performance edge!
The Software Engineer (Intern) will be responsible for developing and maintaining the engineering tools platform in EMC Engineering Tools & process team under Enterprise Mobile Computing (EMC) organization. The candidate will be responsible for interfacing with internal product development Engineers, industry experts and business stakeholders to determine needs, future trends, and translating them into platform solutions. The candidate will be contributing in developing internal tools process, configurations, generating wiki reports and custom integrations to build an end to end integrated development platform. The ideal candidate will be comfortable with DevOps best practices and be able to identify and automate manual engineering practices to increase our developer’s efficiency.

Responsibilities
Perform DevOps Tooling implementation and support.
Learn, contribute and enhance the existing SRT and Polarion custom build integration.
Contribute towards Toolscontainerization under Microservice initiatives.
Build Polarion Classic Wiki based engineering report for engineering traceability.
Develop planning, organizational and time management skills.
Increase technology knowledge and skills.
Develop team-based work competencies.
Develop interpersonal skills to communicate with employees.
Develop interpersonal skills to communicate with day-to-day business contacts through follow up activities.
Develop interpersonal skills to communicate with external and external customers.

Qualifications
Current enrollment in an undergraduate/graduate degree program in a discipline related to the project specifics. If an undergraduate, must be at the senior level.
Programming: Java, Python Java Script, JSON, Web Development, REST or SOAP API
Database: SQL, MySQL, NOSQL
Tools: JIRA, Confluence, Git, Bitbucket, Sonar, Github, Jenkins
Intellectual curiosity with a strong desire to learn and grow
Proven leadership and excellence in professional, academic and/or extracurricular experiences
Strong problem-solving abilities
Effective verbal and written communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills
Ability to collaborate as part of a team
Proficient in Microsoft Office (including Excel, Word, & PowerPoint)
Must be authorized to work in the U.S. on a permanent basis without requiring sponsorship
Desired Skills:
Understanding of Agile methodology (Scrum, Scaled, LESS)
Understanding of the Code Review process
Understanding of coding rules and standards",software intern python,https://early-careers-zebra.icims.com/jobs/53756/intern---software-engineering/login?iis=EQuest&iisn=LinkedIn_Slots,New York,Intern - Software Engineering
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Applications are due by February 8, 2019 at 11:59pm PT. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and it's in the candidate's best interest to apply early. Thank you for your patience while we consider your application.

Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: Mountain View, CA, USA; Boulder, CO, USA; Cambridge, MA, USA; Chicago, IL, USA; Irvine, CA, USA; Kirkland, WA, USA; Los Angeles, CA, USA; New York, NY, USA; Pittsburgh, PA, USA; San Bruno, CA, USA; Seattle, WA, USA; San Francisco, CA, USA; Sunnyvale, CA, USA; Madison, WI, USA

Join us for a unique 12-14 week paid internship that offers personal and professional development, an executive speaker series, and community-building. This program will give you an opportunity to work on complex computer science solutions, to develop scalable, distributed software systems, and also to collaborate on multitudes of smaller projects that have universal appeal - which requires research, awareness, interactivity, and the ability to ask the right questions.

Depending On Your Background And Experience, You Will Be Working In One Of The Following Areas

From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, Social to Local, Google Engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another. We focus on being a collaborative, global organization consisting of engineers who are ready to address some of technology's greatest challenges. As a Software Engineering Intern, you will work on our core products and services as well as those which support key functions of our engineering operations.

Product and Systems Development

Whether it's finding new and innovative ways to advance search quality, building computing platform and networking technologies, automating the indexing of videos, or continuing to refine and scale complex auction systems (just to name a few), you will be developing solutions to some of the most technical challenges out there. You will research, conceive and develop software applications to extend and improve on Google's product offerings, and collaborate on scalability issues involving access to massive amounts of data and information. Examples of specialist domains include: UI development with AJAX and similar technologies, security, embedded systems and mobile apps (Android), developer tools (IDEs, large-scale build systems, compilers).

Engineering Productivity

As a Software Engineer in the Engineering Productivity organization, you'll use your software design, analysis and programming skills to create innovative automated test systems. The test team undertakes a broad range of challenges on a daily basis, designing and building intelligent systems that can explore various use cases and scenarios for distributed computing infrastructure. Just imagine trying to design and build an automated testing system for something that's never been done before.

Site Reliability

Software Engineers working in Site Reliability are involved in every facet of Google's production and work on the cutting edge of cloud-based computing. As a member of this team, you are in the thick of everything involved with keeping Google running, from code-level troubleshooting of traffic anomalies to maintenance of our most cutting-edge services; from monitoring and alerts to building new automation infrastructure. Software Engineers on this team love to create robust and scalable software that scales to tens of millions of users. You will handle challenging, novel situations every day, and work with just about every other Engineering and Operations team to provide services and applications that are quintessentially Google - fast, reliable and accessible to all.

Google is and always will be an engineering company. We hire people with a broad set of technical skills who are ready to take on some of technology's greatest challenges and make an impact on millions, if not billions, of users. At Google, engineers not only revolutionize search, they routinely work on massive scalability and storage solutions, large-scale applications and entirely new platforms for developers around the world. From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, Social to Local, Google engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another.

Responsibilities
Research, conceive and develop software applications to extend and improve on Google's product offering.
Contribute to a wide variety of projects utilizing natural language processing, artificial intelligence, data compression, machine learning and search technologies.
Collaborate on scalability challenges involving access to massive amounts of data and information.


Qualifications

Minimum qualifications:
Currently pursuing a PhD degree in Computer Science or in a related technical field.
Programming experience in one or more of the following: C/C++, Java or Python.


Preferred Qualifications
Returning to a degree program after the completion of the internship.
Implementation skills with one or more general purpose programming languages, including but not limited to: Java, C/C++, C#, Objective C, Python, JavaScript and/or Go.
Research experience in the following areas; Algorithms, Architecture, Artificial Intelligence, Compilers, Database, Data Mining, Distributed Systems, Machine Learning, Networking and/or Systems.
Demonstrated background in computer science, with competencies in data structures, algorithms and software design.


At Google, we don’t just accept difference - we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products and our community. Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

To all recruitment agencies Google does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Google employees or any other company location. Google is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",software intern python,https://careers.google.com/jobs/results/5702775423696896-software-engineering-intern-phd-summer-2019/?src=Online%2FLinkedIn%2Flinkedin_us&utm_campaign=contract&utm_medium=jobposting&utm_source=linkedin,New York,"Software Engineering Intern, PhD, Summer 2019"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As a Software Engineering Intern at Enigma, you'll work alongside a brilliant team of other curious, data-obsessed co-workers, who want to share the magic that Enigma products can bring to a customer. We build products to ingest large, diverse datasets, map them to ontologies, probabilistically identify likely connections, and then use these knowledge graphs to power applications to create transformative value - from saving lives to preventing financial crime. By applying Enigma technologies to real-world industry challenges, engineers at Enigma are responsible for enabling next-generation business processes for blue chip clients, one workflow, process, or team at a time. Software engineers are guided by four principles: ""Always be shipping,"" ""Customer obsession,"" ""Strive for perfect,"" and ""Think big, start small."" Ultimately, we are excited about data's impact on the world and are looking for engineers who are curious, generous and can hustle in a fast-paced environment.

Qualities We Value
Comfortable using the right tool for the job, rather than any sticky preference for a tool or technology
Motivated by working on hard problems with smart people
Enjoy learning and sharing your valuable feedback across our engineering teams, so we can continue to iterate and improve
Highly motivated, results-oriented, and take pride in being a problem solver


Qualifications
Experience in one or more of {Python, Go, Scala, Java}
Comfortable developing for/in a Linux environment (regardless of distribution)
2019 and 2020 graduates are encouraged to apply if you are self-directed, seek out new responsibility, and strive for excellence


Projects We Work On

Products

We are constantly building and improving the Enigma product suite. Our products range from scalable data systems to orchestration of complex Machine Learning pipelines. We're improving existing products for Fortune 500 customers, and providing the Enigma toolbox to hundreds of analysts and investigators. At the same time, new products are in the works to intelligently link and serve large, disparate, structured and unstructured data to our users.

See our work in action: Simplifying Sanctions in Compliance and Mapping NYC Restaurant Grades.

Machine Learning

One of the core pillars of Software Engineering at Enigma is Machine Learning, and its impact ranges from powering important products to envelope-pushing algorithms. Not only are we using Machine Learning in each of our products, but we're also expanding the boundaries on research areas like Entity Resolution, Agent Simulations and Predicting Human Behavior.

Read about how we improved entity resolution with SOFT TF IDF algorithm.

Data Engineering

Enigma's first set of products was built to power Enigma Public: managing, crawling, linking, and monitoring data systems that power the broadest public data repository on the Internet. The challenges of public data are more demanding than ever, as data origins, types, available languages increase exponentially.

Our Story

Enigma is a rapidly growing enterprise technology company based in the Flatiron neighborhood of New York City. We are Series B funded, partnering with some of the best investors in the world: New Enterprise Associates, Two Sigma Ventures, Comcast Ventures, Crosslink Capital, American Express Ventures, and others.

Founded in 2012, Enigma was started based on the realization that there was tremendous potential in using public data to understand how the world works, but that it was untapped because the data is highly fragmented and disconnected. Enigma set out to change that by building and organizing one of the largest collections of public data in the world, and our big coming out party was winning TechCrunch Disrupts Battlefield in 2013. Our vision has remained steadfast, we want to empower people to interpret, and improve, the world around them. However, we have expanded our ability to realize this vision by combining our massive public data repository with an ecosystem of software and tools designed to link, resolve, enhance and apply data to help global-scale companies take on some of their hardest problems, ranging from preventing money laundering to ensuring patient safety.

We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or veteran status.",software intern python,https://boards.greenhouse.io/enigmaio/jobs/1324232?gh_src=fe8ae0e81,New York,"Software Engineering Intern, Summer 2019"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
How are we doing that? By building a best in class technology platform for all of the world’s content.

Job Description

NewsCred is looking for Full Stack Software Engineering Interns with the technical skills and talent to navigate our entire stack, solving interesting and challenging problems along the way. Whether you’re improving our search infrastructure using the latest techniques in information retrieval and natural language processing, or analyzing millions of events to discover what content performs best for our customers, or building a slick content management user experience, you will play a key role in all parts of the product lifecycle: brainstorming, design, prototyping, planning, implementation, and launch.
mproving our search infrastructure using the latest techniques in information retrieval and natural language processing, or analyzing millions of events to discover what content performs best for our customers, or building a slick content management user experience, you will play a key role in all parts of the product lifecycle: brainstorming, design, prototyping, planning, implementation, and launch.
At NewsCred, we view internships as dress rehearsals for the real deal. Interns are paired with a mentor and operate as a full time part of the team. This means that your contributions make it to production and you work to enhance our product all the while learning about our product, technology stack and culture.
The Stack We’re open to evolving our platform with newer technologies and here are some of our current tools:
Python, Scala, JavaScript
ElasticSearch & Solr
AngularJS
Node
MongoDB, MySQL, Redshift & Redis
Kinesis, RabbitMQ, SQS
Ansible
AWS
The Team The Engineering team at NewsCred consists of some of the most considerate, compassionate and fun-loving people you’ll ever meet. We seek people who can contribute and share in the success and happiness of our team. We do this by organizing ourselves into small, autonomous teams that are self-sufficient and fully empowered to deliver a complete product. We believe in continuous deployment, which enables us to deliver incremental value to our clients on an ongoing basis. About You
You love creating software in a collaborative and close-knit team that is beautifully crafted, highly impactful while being obsessive about our customers' success. You’re curious about the latest emerging technologies and love thinking about ways in which we can apply them to make our product better. You may or may not have a computer science degree.
Diversity & Inclusion
At NewsCred, we believe that diversity is an essential part of a healthy workplace, and that inclusivity is more than just good intentions. The NewsCred Diversity Council's mission is twofold: We aim to both increase and maintain a diverse workforce, and to create an inclusive environment for all employees regardless of race, gender, gender identity, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, age, ability, or background. We continue to set goals for ourselves and recognize areas for improvement as we go.
Benefits
Medical, vision, and dental
401k match
Unlimited vacation days
12 week parental leave
Flexible work policy
Ping pong tables
Massage days (Don’t worry, it’s by a professional).
Additional Information
Everything we talk about in our “How We Work” document
Best-in-class compensation plans and equity in the company
The opportunity to work with some of the smartest minds in the industry
All-company Demo Day/catered lunches on Friday
Come see why our culture has won numerous awards, including Fortune Magazine's 100 Best Workplaces and a spot on the 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising + Marketing for the second year in a row! Learn more at newscred.com and follow us on Twitter@NewsCred",software intern python,https://neuvoo.com/view/?tracking-details=YmlkPTAuMTAmYmlkdHlwZT1jcGMmc3JjPUxpbmtlZEluKExpbWl0ZWRMaXN0aW5ncykmaklkPWEzYWFkN2JjNTYxY2NkZjc3NGVhNzY4MzY5ZTFkOTQyJmVtZD0wLjAw&id=rc2pvuccjj&source=joveo_bulk2&utm_source=partner&utm_medium=joveo_bulk2&puid=g9de8add1dbec9ag79aae9ab3aed9addgad6gad6bed3bddfgddgeed3cbdbbbddfcdc3e&oapply=org_v2018-11&abt=v1&splitab=1&action=emailAlert,New York,Full Stack Software Engineering Intern - NewsCred
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Company Description

At Red Hat, we connect an innovative community of customers, partners, and contributors to deliver an open source stack of trusted, high-performing solutions. We offer cloud, Linux, middleware, storage, and virtualization technologies, together with award-winning global customer support, consulting, and implementation services. Red Hat is a rapidly growing company supporting more than 90% of Fortune 500 companies.

Job Summary

The Red Hat Engineering team is looking for a Software Engineering Intern to join one of our platform infrastructure teams in New York, NY. In this role, you will work on software projects for our application delivery platform built on top of Kubernetes and Red Hat OpenShift.

Primary Job Responsibilities
Build and deliver a software project which will enhance platform customer satisfaction or velocity
Shepherd the project through all phases of the software development life cycle
Create solutions which meet the project’s scalability or reliability requirements

Required Skills
Understanding of software engineering principles like requirements gathering, system architecture, and testing
Familiarity with Git or another distributed version control system (DVCS)
Fluency in Python or Go
Familiarity with data structures and algorithms

Experience With The Following Is Considered a Plus
User experience design
System administration
Deployment or maintainance of a service on Kubernetes
Creating software that manages other software
Open source contributions
Linux containers and their application

Red Hat is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer. We review applications for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, uniformed services, genetic information, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, or any other basis prohibited by law.

Red Hat does not seek or accept unsolicited resumes or CVs from recruitment agencies. We are not responsible for, and will not pay, any fees, commissions, or any other payment related to unsolicited resumes or CVs except as required in a written contract between Red Hat and the recruitment agency or party requesting payment of a fee.

Interested in this job?

Apply Apply

Share

Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.

Share on your newsfeed",software intern python,https://us-redhat.icims.com/jobs/65499/software-engineering-internship/job?hub=7&%26%3Fmode=job&%26iis=Job%2BBoard&%26iisn=LinkedIn%2BPosting&mobile=false&width=702&height=500&bga=true&needsRedirect=false&jan1offset=-420&jun1offset=-360,New York,Software Engineering Internship
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As a member of our internship program, you will have the unique opportunity to work alongside an exceptional group of technologists while developing hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment. Your growth and success are paramount to us: You'll have the direct guidance and mentorship of one of our experienced engineers, and will be matched with a team that best suits your interests. We'll make sure that you have a thorough understanding of the different types of problems we're solving; so that you can work on projects that not only excite you, but drive meaningful, real-world impact.

Oscar engineering builds industry-leading software that aims to transform the healthcare experience. We work on high-impact projects across our front-end, mobile, platform, and data teams; building rich web applications, product backends and services and the infrastructure that supports it all.

Our products and platform are built primarily in Python, JavaScript, Java, Objective C and Go.

Typical Projects Include
Interactive care router using React and Google Maps, backed by a healthcare guidance engine based on NLP techniques
Building easy-to-understand interfaces for our internal teams that aggregate and distill complex data sets
Ingestion of health events via a real-time data pipeline, and a timeline to let members view their health history including doctor's appointments, lab results, prescriptions, etc
Building and improving the software infrastructure we run on: cluster management, service discovery, continuous integration
Android and iOS apps for members to access their health information on the go and track their fitness activity
Who You Are
Excited to take part in reinventing healthcare
Have experience developing rich applications with HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript, or
Have experience in a systems language like Java, C++, or Go, and a scripting language like Python or Ruby
Want to work closely with product and design teams
We look forward to hearing from you!

At Oscar, being an Equal Opportunity Employer means more than upholding discrimination-free hiring practices. It means that we work to cultivate an environment where exceptional people can be their most authentic selves and find both belonging and support. We're on a mission to change healthcare -- an experience made whole by your unique background and perspectives.

Oscar applicants are considered solely based on their qualifications, without regard to applicant's disability or need for accommodation. Any Oscar applicant who requires reasonable accommodations during the application process should contact the Oscar Benefits Team (accommodations@hioscar.com) to make the need for an accommodation known.

Pay Transparency Policy: Oscar's Pay Transparency Policy ensures that you won't be discharged or discriminated against based on whether you've inquired about, discussed, or disclosed your pay. Read the full policy here.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/23410865368f099f116ea12b1ff2ed5e,New York,Software Engineer: Intern 2019 - Data/Systems
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Firm Overview

Schonfeld Strategic Advisors LLC, an SEC-registered investment adviser, is a multi-manager platform that invests its capital with both internal and external / partner portfolio managers, primarily on a long-term, exclusive basis, across statistical arbitrage and other quantitatively-driven strategies, fundamental equity strategies, and tactical trading strategies. Schonfeld has created a unique structure to provide global portfolio managers with autonomy, flexibility and significant support to best enable them to maximize the value of their businesses. Over the last 30 years, Schonfeld and its predecessors have successfully invested in and supported hundreds of portfolio managers. Schonfeld develops and invests heavily in proprietary technology, infrastructure, and risk analytics. Schonfeld's portfolio exposure has expanded across the Americas, Europe and Asia, as well as among multiple asset classes and products.

Summer Program Overview

We are seeking a team of software engineers to spend ten weeks in our New York-based office where you will be immersed in the culture and atmosphere of Schonfeld, working alongside experienced professionals. Interns will learn about Microservices based frameworks, Python and Java-based services deployed on AWS and how we as a firm use technology to solve business problems. Interns will be managed by an energetic leader and also be provided an individual mentor. They will participate in organized team-building events, lunch and learns, social activities, and networking with various members of the firm and senior management throughout the summer. The team of interns will present their project at the completion of the program and may be extended a full-time offer of employment.

Work Experience Requirements/Preferences
Demonstrated software engineering skills from previous internships, coding competitions, or publications
Familiar with programming languages like Java, C++, or Python and excited to pick up new languages (we use AWS, Microservices, etc)
High levels of creativity and quick problem solving capabilities
Interest in Capital Markets or Finance
Computer Science students graduating in 2019/2020",software intern python,https://boards.greenhouse.io/schonfeld/jobs/1402353?gh_src=b346b05d1,New York,Software Developer (Intern 2019)
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Description

IBM CIO (Chief Information Office) Organization is looking for innovative talent for our New York and Connecticut locations who bring fresh new ideas to create a productive environment for all IBMers across the globe through our internship program offering. Our mission is to provide the best work experience in a digital workplace to all IBM employees and consequently positively impact on the way IBM deliver what our clients need.

Are you interested in working in an innovative and collaborative environment for the summer? If so, this is your chance to work in the first IBM area to become agile and to create meaningful solutions that impact our technology and business transformation for a new business era - all in just one summer!

Software Developer’s have passion and experience for building responsive, elegant and engaging experiences with future friendly web technologies. Developers will lead the conversation about the various devices a person will use when engaging with our products. They will collaborate on the overall design, creating prototypes to explore and demonstrate nuanced interaction patterns; which will influence or be the frameworks used for applications.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
Minimum of 1-year experience in programming and software development using at least two programming languages, preferably Java, C++, Python, Node.js and/or R
Knowledge of Object-Oriented Programming constructs and design principles
Knowledge of development and deployment on a cloud-based environment like IBM BlueMix, AWS, Azure, etc.
Minimum of 1-year experience using problem solving skills such as: Analyze causes using existing techniques or tools, prepare and recommend solution alternatives
Ability to collaborate with others
Ability to challenge the validity of given procedures & processes with the intent to enhance and improve
Demonstrated experience in working with business leaders to design solutions
Enrolled in a Bachelor of Science in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Computer Information Technology, Management Information Systems or a similar degree program
Ability to work in the United States without the need for current or future IBM sponsorship

Preferred Tech And Prof Experience
Experience using Agile and DevOps methodologies
Experience with blockchain design and development
Experience with other programming languages

EO Statement
IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.",software intern python,,New York,Software Developer Intern/Coop - New York/Connecticut
2018-11-15,,"Job description
We’re seeking great minds like yours to help us build the next generation in database technology. Join the team that is helping the world’s most sophisticated organizations transform their industries by harnessing the power of data. Our internship program is based in our New York City office.

As a Summer Intern you will collaborate closely with full-time engineering mentors on either an existing team or a new project. In both cases, you’ll do work that matters and gain practical software engineering experience. Interns are fully integrated software engineers who spend the summer pushing code, working on MongoDB’s products, internal tools, and more. Whether it’s contributing to our open-source database and drivers, our enterprise tools, our backend-as-a-service Stitch, or one of our Cloud offerings, interns make lasting contributions to our engineering team.

Our summer program is comprehensive and interactive - you won’t sit behind a desk all day. We have social outings (think team dinners, broadway shows, NYC sightseeing, and more) and an intern speaker series where you’ll hear from some of the most significant and important people in tech today. You’ll gain insight into what makes a multi-billion dollar company run. At the end of the summer you’ll be a better software engineer and a more informed citizen of the world.

What We Are Looking For In You
You are in the process of receiving a Bachelor’s or Master's degree in in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related field
You have a solid foundation in computer science theory, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design
You are proficient in one of our commonly used languages - which include C++, Go, Python, Java, Javascript, Node.js - or a comparable high level programming language
You are genuinely interested in MongoDB the company and are excited to use MongoDB in a project, if you haven’t already",software intern python,https://www.mongodb.com/careers/jobs/1306593?t=ircv7l,New York,Software Engineering Intern - Summer 2019
2018-11-15,,"Job description
When we started NewsCred, we weren't satisfied with the way brands marketed to us. Fast-forward to today: We're now the world's leading content marketing company. We build software that supports marketers in content planning, creation, publishing, and analysis. We help brands speak to their audiences by providing both bespoke original content and content licensed from the world's leading publishers. Finally, as pioneers in our industry, we provide unique professional services to ensure that our customers find measurable success through content marketing.

How are we doing that? By building a best in class technology platform for all of the world's content.

Job Description

NewsCred is looking for Full Stack Software Engineering Interns with the technical skills and talent to navigate our entire stack, solving interesting and challenging problems along the way. Whether you're improving our search infrastructure using the latest techniques in information retrieval and natural language processing, or analyzing millions of events to discover what content performs best for our customers, or building a slick content management user experience, you will play a key role in all parts of the product lifecycle: brainstorming, design, prototyping, planning, implementation, and launch.

At NewsCred, we view internships as dress rehearsals for the real deal. Interns are paired with a mentor and operate as a full time part of the team. This means that your contributions make it to production and you work to enhance our product all the while learning about our product, technology stack and culture.

The Stack

We're open to evolving our platform with newer technologies and here are some of our current tools:
Python, Scala, JavaScript
ElasticSearch & Solr
AngularJS
Node
MongoDB, MySQL, Redshift & Redis
Kinesis, RabbitMQ, SQS
Ansible
AWS

The Team

The Engineering team at NewsCred consists of some of the most considerate, compassionate and fun-loving people you'll ever meet. We seek people who can contribute and share in the success and happiness of our team. We do this by organizing ourselves into small, autonomous teams that are self-sufficient and fully empowered to deliver a complete product. We believe in continuous deployment, which enables us to deliver incremental value to our clients on an ongoing basis.

About You

You love creating software in a collaborative and close-knit team that is beautifully crafted, highly impactful while being obsessive about our customers' success. You're curious about the latest emerging technologies and love thinking about ways in which we can apply them to make our product better. You may or may not have a computer science degree.

Diversity & Inclusion

At NewsCred, we believe that diversity is an essential part of a healthy workplace, and that inclusivity is more than just good intentions. The NewsCred Diversity Council's mission is twofold: We aim to both increase and maintain a diverse workforce, and to create an inclusive environment for all employees regardless of race, gender, gender identity, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, age, ability, or background. We continue to set goals for ourselves and recognize areas for improvement as we go.

Benefits
Medical, vision, and dental
401k match
Unlimited vacation days
12 week parental leave
Flexible work policy
Ping pong tables
Massage days (Don't worry, it's by a professional).


Additional Information
Everything we talk about in our ""How We Work"" document
Best-in-class compensation plans and equity in the company
The opportunity to work with some of the smartest minds in the industry
All-company Demo Day/catered lunches on Friday

Come see why our culture has won numerous awards, including Fortune Magazine's 100 Best Workplaces and a spot on the 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising + Marketing for the second year in a row! Learn more at newscred.com and follow us on Twitter@NewsCred",software intern python,https://www.newscred.com/careers/?gh_jid=470369&gh_src=2gup8v1,New York,Full Stack Software Engineering Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Description

Kodak Alaris started with Kodak's Personalized Imaging and Document Imaging businesses and was created on September 3, 2013. Our plan is to maintain the Kodak brand's rich, global heritage, and inject it with a new speed and agility. Today's markets and technologies are constantly changing and at Kodak Alaris, we're ready to meet those changes head-on. The name 'Alaris' is all about speed and agility. It's inspired by the Latin Alacritas, 'lively'. In plain old English, alacrity also means cheerful, eager and willing. Which we think just about describes us and the way we approach everything, from research and development to each individual customer.

About The Job

The self-motivated person who fills this position will be joining and contributing to a dynamic and determined team to successfully transform how we provide services for our applications supporting ship-to-home, net-to-retail and direct kiosk connect. Close collaboration with frontend application developers to architect, design, and develop solutions to meet the client's needs through a fast-paced agile development approach is critical. This initiative will have a lasting positive impact on enhancing the consumer experience.
This role requires several complex components using modern and disparate technologies, requiring that the engineer be knowledgeable of the entire SDLC.

Responsibilities Include
Conceptualize, design and code required to drive a responsive system supporting front-end applications
Build applications to work across browsers and device platforms (desktop, tablet, smartphone)
Create, clean and validate code for modularity, scalability and reusability
Develop and design systems solutions and services utilizing platforms and solutions best suited to solve the problem, current services developed and deployed on Microsoft Azure.
Build and execute test cases at unit testing level
Create and maintain software documentation
Provide help required to support customer satisfaction issues. This may include support beyond typical business hours and include communication with internal stakeholders
Test and evaluate new and emerging technologies to provide solutions for implementation
About You

You are a passionate and result-driven individual who has the following experience:
Experience developing OOP and system services, Visual C#, Java, Azure, AWS, Python,
Design of modern restful services that are robust and scalable.
Have technical competency in software development and good understanding of software design principles and processes
Strong aptitude to learn, a "" can-do"" attitude to achieve and a drive to build a career by developing high quality software to solve real-world problems
Excellent problem solving and analytical skills
Great communication skills, work ethic and willingness to be a team player
Analyzes, defines and documents requirements for data, workflow, logical processes, interfaces with other systems, internal and external checks and controls and outputs
Develop, integrate and implement business application systems
Investigate issues/defects and recommend appropriate course of action
Analyzes, defines and documents requirements for data, workflow, logical processes, interfaces with other systems, internal and external checks and controls and outputs
Experience with TFS (Team Foundation System), Git, vNext Builds and Nuget Packaging a plus but not required.
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science
Kodak Alaris is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or veteran status.",software intern python,https://recruiting.adp.com/srccar/public/nghome.guid?c=1215501&d=External&prc=RMPOD4&r=5000424753606#/,New York,Software Development Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As an intern working on internal projects you have direct access to the users of your solutions. Our internal products improve the efficiency and amplify the effectiveness of other teams through services and applications. Examples of internal projects include helping accounting understand and accurately report on company growth, helping marketing predict where they can be most effective, and building out a reliable event stream from squarespace.com.

Responsibilities
Work closely with other engineers, building bespoke high quality solutions for an internal customer
Participate as a member of a team of engineers via code reviews and technical discussions
Communicate with stakeholders and designers to lead development of a solution
Learn new languages, data stores, and other technologies as needed


Qualifications
Currently pursuing a BS or MS in Computer Science, Engineering, or related technical discipline
Anticipated to graduate in the spring of 2020 or December 2019
A foundation in computer science with competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design practices
Experience with a dynamic language (Python prefered) and datastores such as Postgres, Mongo, Redis, and Elasticsearch
Curiosity about how a technology company builds software for itself


About Squarespace

Squarespace makes beautiful products to help people with creative ideas succeed. By blending elegant design and sophisticated engineering, we empower millions of people — from individuals and local artists to entrepreneurs shaping the world’s most iconic businesses — to share their stories with the world. Squarespace’s team of more than 750 is headquartered in downtown New York City, with offices in Dublin and Portland. For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.

Today, more than a million people around the globe use Squarespace to share different perspectives and experiences with the world. Not only do we embrace and celebrate the diversity of our customer base, but we also strive for the same in our employees. At Squarespace, we are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender, gender identity or expression, or veteran status. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",software intern python,https://www.squarespace.com/careers/jobs/786407,New York,Software Engineer Intern - Internal Products
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Summary And Essential Functions

Known for its scientific and operational excellence, Regeneron is a leading science-based biopharmaceutical company that discovers, invents, develops, manufactures, and commercializes medicines for the treatment of serious medical conditions. Regeneron commercializes medicines for eye diseases, high LDL-cholesterol, atopic dermatitis and a rare inflammatory condition and has product candidates in development in other areas of high unmet medical need, including rheumatoid arthritis, asthma, pain, cancer and infectious diseases.

This person will be working in Formulation Development in Tarrytown, NY. Alongside drug discovery, molecular dynamic simulations and computational tools at large have begun to find applications within drug product development. The student will use existing computational tools to develop and setup protocols to study drug stability. The main aim of the project will be to compare in silico estimations of protein stability to real time stability. The student will also develop protocols to study the effects of various excipients on protein structure, stability and intermolecular interactions. The student will have a chance to work collaboratively within the formulation development group and also be a part of cross-functional discussions geared towards implementing computational methods at various stages of drug product development.

This position is ideally looking for a 6 month full-time Co-op student but will also consider a 3 month Intern. Timeframe is flexible.

Experience And Required Skills

Start building your skills at Regeneron.
PhD student highly preferred, will also consider a Masters of Undergrad student
Must be pursuing a degree in Computational Biology, Biophysics, Bioinformatics, Biochemistry, Chemical Biology, Chemical Engineering, or Biomedical Engineering
Experience with computational biology and molecular dynamic simulations
Extensive experience with MD simulation software packages such as discovery studio, MOE is highly preferred. Experience with basic computer programming and coding is preferred (Python, Matlab). Basic biochemistry laboratory skills.
General Intern Program Information
Must be enrolled in, or accepted to, an academic program pursuing a PhD, MS or BS
Summer Program is full-time (~40 hrs/wk) for at least 10 weeks and is paid
Prefer demonstrated leadership in areas such as campus activities, clubs, sports or the community
Minimum GPA of 3.0
You will work with a specific manager on a project(s)
Enjoy weekly 1 hour Intern Program events: learn about other areas of the company from VPs and other employees, soft skills workshops, networking, volunteering, and more!
Present to your team on your summer project
Transportation And Housing
A free shuttle is offered from the North White Plains or Tarrytown train stations to the Tarrytown campus
Get to know other incoming Interns on our closed LinkedIn page when you accept an offer
This is an opportunity to join our select team that is already leading the way in the Pharmaceutical/Biotech industry. Apply today and learn more about Regeneron’s unwavering commitment to combining good science & good business.

To all agencies: Please, no phone calls or emails to any employee of Regeneron about this opening. All resumes submitted by search firms/employment agencies to any employee at Regeneron via-email, the internet or in any form and/or method will be deemed the sole property of Regeneron, unless such search firms/employment agencies were engaged by Regeneron for this position and a valid agreement with Regeneron is in place. In the event a candidate who was submitted outside of the Regeneron agency engagement process is hired, no fee or payment of any kind will be paid.

Regeneron is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Person Type

PhD Intern
Job Category
R&D
Sub-Category
Research",software intern python,https://sjobs.brassring.com/TGnewUI/Search/home/HomeWithPreLoad?PageType=JobDetails&partnerid=25570&siteid=5080&jobId=1164910&%26jobsource=LinkedIn&%26jobsource=LinkedIn&%26jobsource=LinkedIn#jobDetails=1164910_5080,New York,Formulation Development Intern or Co-op
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As a member of our internship program, you will have the unique opportunity to work alongside an exceptional group of technologists while developing hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment. Your growth and success are paramount to us: You'll have the direct guidance and mentorship of one of our experienced engineers, and will be matched with a team that best suits your interests. We'll make sure that you have a thorough understanding of the different types of problems we're solving; so that you can work on projects that not only excite you, but drive meaningful, real-world impact.

Oscar engineering builds industry-leading software that aims to transform the healthcare experience. We work on high-impact projects across our front-end, mobile, platform, and data teams; building rich web applications, product backends and services and the infrastructure that supports it all.

Our products and platform are built primarily in Python, JavaScript, Java, Objective C and Go.

Typical Projects Include
Interactive care router using React and Google Maps, backed by a healthcare guidance engine based on NLP techniques
Building easy-to-understand interfaces for our internal teams that aggregate and distill complex data sets
Ingestion of health events via a real-time data pipeline, and a timeline to let members view their health history including doctor's appointments, lab results, prescriptions, etc
Building and improving the software infrastructure we run on: cluster management, service discovery, continuous integration
Android and iOS apps for members to access their health information on the go and track their fitness activity


Who You Are
Excited to take part in reinventing healthcare
Have experience developing rich applications with HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript, or
Have experience in a systems language like Java, C++, or Go, and a scripting language like Python or Ruby
Want to work closely with product and design teams

We look forward to hearing from you!

At Oscar, being an Equal Opportunity Employer means more than upholding discrimination-free hiring practices. It means that we work to cultivate an environment where exceptional people can be their most authentic selves and find both belonging and support. We're on a mission to change healthcare -- an experience made whole by your unique background and perspectives.

Oscar applicants are considered solely based on their qualifications, without regard to applicant's disability or need for accommodation. Any Oscar applicant who requires reasonable accommodations during the application process should contact the Oscar Benefits Team (accommodations@hioscar.com) to make the need for an accommodation known.

Pay Transparency Policy: Oscar's Pay Transparency Policy ensures that you won't be discharged or discriminated against based on whether you've inquired about, discussed, or disclosed your pay. Read the full policy here.",software intern python,https://www.hioscar.com/careers/1318711?gh_jid=1318711&gh_src=326b04e91,New York,Software Engineer: Intern 2019 - Data/Systems
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Information

Id

#24241836

# of Positions :

1

Minimum Education Level

Bachelor's Degree

Experience Required

none

Duration

Full Time Regular

Shift

Unspecified

Hours Per Week

40

Position Description

Job Description

SRC, Inc. is currently seeking electrical engineers graduating in May 2019 to design, develop and test leading-edge radar and communications systems. We are looking for engineers to join our high-performing teams and develop creative solutions to help solve difficult technical problems.

Responsibilities


Implement signal processing and data analysis algorithms (e.g. trackers, detectors) and graphical user interfaces (GUIs) in MATLAB and Python
Reverse engineer UAS (or drone) radio-frequency (RF) communications using real-time spectrum analyzers
Design system parameters and hardware settings necessary for our radars and software-defined radios to meet their performance requirements
Evaluate performance of RF systems u sing anechoic chambers
Travel to customer sites and government test ranges to perform field testing of electronic systems
Analyze and characterize communication link and radar performance
Validate software models on military grade hardware using equipment such as real-time spectrum analyzers, vector signal generators, high speed oscilloscopes and network analyzers

Position Requirements
Working towards bachelor's degree in computer engineering or electrical engineering, graduating May 2019
Minimum grade point average of 3.0
Students with degrees in mathematics or physics will be considered depending on academic and intern experience
Comfortable learning new skills and technologies
Able to use creative and analytical skills for problem solving
Interested in signal processing, electromagnetics, digital design, electronics, radars, communications, or RF design
Capable of working on teams across multiple disciplines to achieve common goals
Proficient with data analysis tools (e.g. MATLAB, Octave, MathCAD, Simulink) plus show interest in optimizing challenging problems via scripting tools (e.g. Python, Perl)
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, with the ability to explain complex problems to both technical and non-technical teammates alike
10 percent travel may be required

Preferred Requirements
Experience with MATLAB

Security Clearance Requirements

Must be a U.S. citizen. Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.

As an EEO/AA employer, the Company does not discriminate in its employment practices due to an applicant or employee's race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, veteran or disability status, or any other basis protected by federal law. In addition, the Company complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the Company has facilities and employees

Name

Company Information

SRC

Description

SRC’s mission is to keep America safe and strong by protecting its people, environment, and way of life. We will do this by focusing on our customers’ needs through the innovative application of science, technology, and information to solve problems of national significance.

As a not-for-profit, research and development company that develops unique, creative solutions for nationally significant challenges in defense, environmental, and intelligence, we’re committed to redefining possible™. Our relentless determination to solve the “impossible” with bright minds, fresh thinking, and fearless innovation, is grounded in over 50 years of experience. We seek and welcome the toughest problems -the ones most critical to our national welfare, the ones where compromise is not an option. By constantly reinvesting in our people and our technologies, we never ask you to accept just what’s possible. We help you go beyond it.

Type

Direct Employer

Address

7502 Round Pond Road
North Syracuse, NY 13212

Application Information

Online

Job Posting Entered On :

9/19/2018

Job Posting Expires On

11/18/2018",software intern python,https://newyork.usnlx.com/viewjob.asp?jobid=24241836,New York,Electrical Engineer (May 2019 Graduates) - SRC
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Software Engineering Internship - Product Offering & Growth

We are looking for passionate software engineering interns that are motivated to learn in a fast-paced environment with a highly collaborative team. You will be working closely with the Product, Design and engineering teams to not only develop, but also help define and execute on projects. This is an exciting opportunity to learn and grow with one of the fastest growing technology-first companies in New York and be part of a team that impact the bottom line and top line of the business.

WeWork Mission

WeWork is the platform for creators, providing hundreds of thousands of members around the world with space, community and services that enable them to do what they love and create their life's work. Our mission is to create a world where people work to make a life, not just a living, and our own team members are central to that goal.

Technology Charter

WeWork is building a layer of technology to power our vision of “space as a service”. From identifying and designing a new location, to bringing that space to market in an elastic, easy-to-consume way, to seamlessly operating these spaces to delight our members, we are building state-of-the-art systems to automate, optimize, and improve the experience. The data we are collecting is being used to dynamically optimize utilization, pricing, even layout and form factor. This technology advantage has allowed WeWork to scale to 200+ buildings in 20+ countries, and will be our competitive advantage as the company continues to grow.

The Team

The mission of Product Offerings & Growth is to deliver technology that powers the growth of our core businesses, by providing the right products to the right people at the right price at the right time. It includes how we create product offerings out of SKUs, sellable inventory, and membership rules, at a dynamically optimized price. Product Offerings & Growth covers the entire journey of a member, from their first interaction with our website or a salesperson, all the way through providing the right account visibility and flexibility so they stay a member for life and grow with us.

Responsibilities
Shorten the product to market time across WeWork’s portfolio
Drive up revenue through data-driven price optimization
Launch tailored flexible product offerings to enterprise and mid-market members
Improve retention and reduce unexpected churn
Scale our contract/subscription service to accommodate future products and initiatives


Requirements
Currently in your junior year of a BS in Computer Science or equivalent
Hands-on skills and experience with Ruby, Python, Java or other similar OOO languages
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills
Strong communication skills and a desire to be involved in all aspects of the project life-cycle
Ability to work both independently and in groups
Experience in Ruby/Rails, React+Redux, Postgres is a plus",software intern python,https://careers.wework.com/job/WEWOUS3078/Software-Engineering-Summer-Intern-Product-Offerings-Growth?jobsource=recruitics&rx_cid=3006&gh_src=hc1nw5872&rx_campaign=Linkedin1&rx_group=108745&rx_job=4110822002&rx_medium=post&rx_source=Linkedin,New York,Software Engineering Summer Intern - Product Offerings & Growth
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Applications are due by December 14, 2018 at 11:59pm PT. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and it's in the candidate's best interest to apply early. Thank you for your patience while we consider your application.

Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: Mountain View, CA, USA; Boulder, CO, USA; Cambridge, MA, USA; Chicago, IL, USA; Irvine, CA, USA; Kirkland, WA, USA; Los Angeles, CA, USA; New York, NY, USA; Pittsburgh, PA, USA; San Bruno, CA, USA; Seattle, WA, USA; San Francisco, CA, USA; Sunnyvale, CA, USA; Madison, WI, USA

Join us for a unique 12-14 week paid internship that offers personal and professional development, an executive speaker series, and community-building. This program will give you an opportunity to work on complex computer science solutions, to develop scalable, distributed software systems, and also to collaborate on multitudes of smaller projects that have universal appeal - which requires research, awareness, interactivity, and the ability to ask the right questions.

This application is intended for candidates who are eligible for work authorization in the United States upon completing their education. For internship opportunities in the location where you are eligible for work authorization, please check google.com/students.

Depending On Your Background And Experience, You Will Be Working In One Of The Following Areas

From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, Social to Local, Google Engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another. We focus on being a collaborative, global organization consisting of engineers who are ready to address some of technology's greatest challenges. As a Software Engineering Intern, you will work on our core products and services as well as those which support key functions of our engineering operations.

Product and Systems Development

Whether it's finding new and innovative ways to advance search quality, building computing platform and networking technologies, automating the indexing of videos, or continuing to refine and scale complex auction systems (just to name a few), you will be developing solutions to some of the most technical challenges out there. You will research, conceive and develop software applications to extend and improve on Google's product offerings, and collaborate on scalability issues involving access to massive amounts of data and information. Examples of specialist domains include: UI development with AJAX and similar technologies, security, embedded systems and mobile apps (Android), developer tools (IDEs, large-scale build systems, compilers).

Engineering Productivity

As a Software Engineer in the Engineering Productivity organization, you'll use your software design, analysis and programming skills to create innovative automated test systems. The test team undertakes a broad range of challenges on a daily basis, designing and building intelligent systems that can explore various use cases and scenarios for distributed computing infrastructure. Just imagine trying to design and build an automated testing system for something that's never been done before.

Site Reliability

Software Engineers working in Site Reliability are involved in every facet of Google's production and work on the cutting edge of cloud-based computing. As a member of this team, you are in the thick of everything involved with keeping Google running, from code-level troubleshooting of traffic anomalies to maintenance of our most cutting-edge services; from monitoring and alerts to building new automation infrastructure. Software Engineers on this team love to create robust and scalable software that scales to tens of millions of users. You will handle challenging, novel situations every day, and work with just about every other Engineering and Operations team to provide services and applications that are quintessentially Google - fast, reliable and accessible to all.

Google is and always will be an engineering company. We hire people with a broad set of technical skills who are ready to take on some of technology's greatest challenges and make an impact on millions, if not billions, of users. At Google, engineers not only revolutionize search, they routinely work on massive scalability and storage solutions, large-scale applications and entirely new platforms for developers around the world. From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, Social to Local, Google engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another.

Responsibilities
Apply knowledge gained in computer science courses to real-world challenges.
Analyze information and evaluate results to choose the best solution to effectively solve challenges.
Develop scripts to automate routine tasks.
Create and support a productive and innovative team. This includes working with peers, managers, and teams.


Qualifications

Minimum qualifications:
Currently enrolled in a Bachelor's degree program in Computer Science, or related technical field.
Experience with Data Structures or Algorithms gathered from: completing a data structures or algorithms class, coursework, course projects, research, individual projects, internships, or other practical experience inside or outside of school or work (including open source hobby coding).
Experience in Software Development and coding in a general purpose programming language.
Examples of coding in one of the following programming languages including but not limited to: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, or Python.


Preferred Qualifications
Authorization to legally work in the United States.
Returning to a degree program after completion of the internship.
Experience programming in two or more of the languages including but not limited to: C, C++, C#, Java, JavaScript, Go or Python.
Experience working with some of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, mobile application development, distributed and parallel systems, machine learning, information retrieval, natural language processing, networking, developing large software systems, and/or security software development.
Demonstrated interest and ability to learn other coding languages as needed.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to speak and write in English.


At Google, we don’t just accept difference - we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products and our community. Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

To all recruitment agencies Google does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Google employees or any other company location. Google is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",software intern python,https://careers.google.com/jobs/results/6494166504505344-software-engineering-intern-bs-summer-2019/?src=Online%2FLinkedIn%2Flinkedin_us&utm_campaign=contract&utm_medium=jobposting&utm_source=linkedin,New York,"Software Engineering Intern, BS, Summer 2019"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
We are looking for Machine Learning Engineering Interns to #JoinTheBand and help drive a data-driven culture across Spotify. You will work on a variety of problems such as content recommendation, personalization, optimization, user intelligence, and content classification. Collaborative efforts with your team will result in new and interesting hypotheses, tests and scaling to large data sets with hundreds of billions of data points. Above all, your work will impact the way the world experiences music.

What You’ll Do
Apply machine learning, collaborative filtering, NLP, and deep learning methods to massive data sets
Prototype new algorithms, evaluate with small scale experiments, and later productionize solutions at scale to our 180 million active users
Collaborate with a cross functional agile team of software engineers, data engineers, machine learning experts, and others to build new product features
Help drive optimization, testing and tooling to improve data quality
Iterate on recommendation quality through continuous A/B testing
Work from our office in New York City


Who You Are
Currently enrolled in a Ph.D. graduate program in Machine Learning, or related field preferred
You have experience implementing machine learning systems at scale in Java, Scala, Python or similar (not just R or Matlab)
You have a strong mathematical background in statistics and machine learning
You care about agile software processes, data-driven development, reliability, and responsible experimentation
You preferably have experience with data processing and storage frameworks like Hadoop, Scalding, Spark, Storm, Cassandra, Kafka, etc.
Previous machine learning publications or work on open source is a plus


The Intern Gig

Spotify is looking for enthusiastic students/recent graduates with a passion for music and an ambition to go far. This isn’t just any internship! Our paid internship program will give you the chance to gain in-depth knowledge of what it’s like to be a Spotify employee as well as get the opportunity to see the technology side of a fast growing company! Our summer internships will last for 10 weeks this summer and start in the beginning of June.

The deadline to apply is December 16th, 2018 at 11:59 PM, ET. You can expect the following application timeline:
Late December, 2018 – Early February, 2019: Application Review
Late February, 2019 – March, 2019: Interviews
Late March, 2019 – April, 2019: Offers given out
June, 2019: Intern program start

#JoinTheBand

We are proud to foster a workplace free from discrimination. We strongly believe that diversity of experience, perspectives, and background will lead to a better environment for our employees and a better product for our users and our creators. This is something we value deeply and we encourage everyone to come be a part of changing the way the world listens to music.",software intern python,https://www.spotifyjobs.com/job/machine-learning-engineer-summer-internship-phd-new-york-oxhs8fwy/?__jvst=Job%20Board&__jvsd=LinkedInWrapp,New York,"Machine Learning Engineer – Summer Internship, PhD – New York"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Description

As an intern working in Data, you'll sit with a cross-functional team of software engineers, data scientists, and business analysts, working closely with your team to turn complex sources into valuable insights. Our projects improve the efficiency and amplify the effectiveness of other teams through data services and applications. We're responsible for many different datasets and utilize a variety of data pipelines and tools, so we will customize your internship around your interests and skills. You'll be working on a team where constant learning and team-wide knowledge sharing is a core part of our culture.

Our data engineering work here at Squarespace is divided into two areas:

Data Engineering
You'll work directly with data scientists and analysts to help solve problems with data.
You'll work with our data warehouse and ETL systems that ingest data impacting marketing, business metrics and reporting, product research and long term decisions impacting the company.
Data Platforms
You'll work directly with engineers and data scientists to improve the efficiency and amplify the effectiveness of other teams through data services and applications.
You'll work with streaming systems that ingest hundreds of millions of event records per day and batch systems built on top of hundreds of terabytes of data.
Responsibilities
Work closely with other engineers, building high quality solutions and data processing services for an internal customer
Participate as a regular member of a team of engineers. You'll contribute to code reviews, technical discussions, and attend regular team meetings.
Communicate with engineers, analysts and other stakeholders to lead development of solutions
Learn new data stores, ETL tools, and other technologies as needed
Qualifications
Currently pursuing a BS or MS in Computer Science, Engineering, or related technical discipline
A foundation in computer science with competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design practices
Experience with python and data stores such as Postgresql, MongoDB and HDFS
Curiosity about how a technology company builds software for itself
You're motivated and driven. You naturally take responsibility for a project and ask for help when needed.
About Squarespace

Squarespace makes beautiful products to help people with creative ideas succeed. By blending elegant design and sophisticated engineering, we empower millions of people - from individuals and local artists to entrepreneurs shaping the world's most iconic businesses - to share their stories with the world. Squarespace's team of more than 750 is headquartered in downtown New York City, with offices in Dublin and Portland. For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.

Today, more than a million people around the globe use Squarespace to share different perspectives and experiences with the world. Not only do we embrace and celebrate the diversity of our customer base, but we also strive for the same in our employees. At Squarespace, we are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender, gender identity or expression, or veteran status. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/00496015d64ce5957984695badff3396,New York,Software Engineer Intern - Data
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Description

START AND END DATES FOR THIS INTERNSHIP ARE DURING SUMMER 2019 (3 months)

At IBM we have an amazing opportunity to transform the world with cognitive technology. By using the vast amounts of information available today to identify new patterns and make new discoveries, we are helping cities become smarter, hospitals transform patient care, financial institutions minimize risk, and pharmaceuticals find cures for rare diseases. Join the forward-thinking teams at IBM solving some of the world’s most complex problems – there is no better place to grow your career!

Cognitive Software Developer Interns
Create and maintain machine learning models with a focus on big data.
Work in Agile, collaborative environments to understand and develop solutions for requirements. This includes designing, coding and testing innovative applications in areas such as machine learning, computational linguistics, Natural Language Processing (NLP), advanced and semantic information search, extraction, induction, classification and exploration.
Assist with implementing, testing and improving algorithms
Employ IBM Design Thinking to create products that provide a great user experience along with high performance, security, quality, and stability.
Are great at solving problems, debugging, troubleshooting, designing and implementing solutions to complex technical issues.
Have a basic understanding of software development and programming in a language such as Java or Python.
Have an interest in, understanding of, or experience with Design Thinking Methodology
Have an interest in, understanding of, or experience with Agile development methodology
Cognitive Software Developer Interns are in demand across IBM's growth areas. You'll be matched and deployed to a development team in a strategic business, based on your offered location and fit. These are office-based positions in IBM locations including:

AZ - Phoenix
CA - Almaden, Costa Mesa*, Emeryville, Foster City, Redwood City, San Francisco*, San Jose
CO - Denver*
GA - Atlanta
MA - Cambridge, Littleton
MN - Rochester
NC - Raleigh, Durham
NY - New York City*, North Castle*, Poughkeepsie, Yorktown Heights
OH - Cleveland, Dublin, Hartland
OR - Hillsboro*
PA - Blue Bell, Pittsburgh*
TX - Austin, Dallas
VT - Essex Junction*

Opportunities in all locations will vary based on business demand
cities with limited opportunities

What You’ll Do
You will create and maintain machine learning models with a focus on big data.
You’ll work in an Agile, collaborative environment to understand and develop solutions for requirements. This includes designing, coding and testing innovative applications in areas such as machine learning, computational linguistics, Natural Language Processing (NLP), advanced and semantic information search, extraction, induction, classification and exploration.
You’ll assist with implementing, testing and improving algorithms in these areas, and will proactively identify and file patentable technology.
You’ll employ IBM Design Thinking to create products that provide a great user experience along with high performance, security, quality, and stability.

Who You Are
You are great at solving problems, debugging, troubleshooting, designing and implementing solutions to complex technical issues.
You thrive on collaboration, working side by side with developers and scientists of all backgrounds and disciplines, and you have very strong verbal and written communication skills.
You have some awareness of knowledge representation and reasoning.
You have a basic understanding of software development and programming in a language such as Java or Python.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
Must have basic knowledge in one of the following technology areas: Java or Python.

Preferred Tech And Prof Experience
Willing to travel up to 10%
Bachelors or Masters Degree

EO Statement
IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.",software intern python,,New York,Cognitive Software Developer Intern Summer 2019
2018-11-15,,"Job description
The Site Reliability Engineering (SRE) teams are looking for passionate students with an interest in systems, programming and networking to help in ensuring that customers around the world are able to access Squarespace sites, that they load quickly, and that all of the features are working properly.

We work together with the product teams to maintain the reliability of existing and new features that are backed by a fleet of microservices, with the infrastructure teams to scale our current data centers and adopt public cloud infrastructure, with the data teams to tackle challenging “big data” issues, and the security teams to keep a close eye on the latest vulnerabilities and constantly protect our product, infrastructure and networks.

The Site Reliability Engineering (SRE) teams are also responsible for designing the systems that allow us to operate on our data centers and evolve the massive Squarespace software engine that serves millions of users worldwide. We implement software for internal DNS management, IP address allocation, and Linux image and package repositories. We build tools for the provisioning of compute capacity on top of VMware, Kubernetes clusters both in our data centers and in public clouds. We work together with Infrastructure Engineering teams to scale up our storage, database and search infrastructure, which ingests close to 2 TBs of data per day. Our internal products include source code management tools, clusters of build agents for frontend and server-side code, automated testing infrastructure, Docker image generation tools, and continuous deployment pipelines, all used by 200+ software engineers in the wider organization. We engineer ELK clusters that ingest 5 TB of logs daily, Graphite time-series databases that process 14 million data points every minute, distributed tracing services that record 500 spans every second, and a Sensu alerting framework that monitors thousands of servers and hundreds of software services at all times.

Responsibilities
Own internal services like Kubernetes and ELK clusters, infrastructure components like MongoDB databases and Couchbase clusters, product-related services like our certificate management pipeline, and everything in between.
Write high-quality infrastructure-as-code that automates the provisioning, deployment, scaling, and monitoring of Squarespace’s infrastructure and ensure it's redundant and fast around the globe.
Work closely with a team of experienced engineers to test your ideas and understand the system.


Qualifications
Pursuing a degree (BS, MS, or PhD) in Computer Science or related technical field.
Experience in Java, C++, Python, Go, or Ruby.
Strong competencies in data structures, algorithms and problem solving.
Preferred to have previous internships or work experience in software or systems engineering.


About Squarespace

Squarespace makes beautiful products to help people with creative ideas succeed. By blending elegant design and sophisticated engineering, we empower millions of people — from individuals and local artists to entrepreneurs shaping the world’s most iconic businesses — to share their stories with the world. Squarespace’s team of more than 750 is headquartered in downtown New York City, with offices in Dublin and Portland. For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.

Today, more than a million people around the globe use Squarespace to share different perspectives and experiences with the world. Not only do we embrace and celebrate the diversity of our customer base, but we also strive for the same in our employees. At Squarespace, we are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender, gender identity or expression, or veteran status. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",software intern python,https://www.squarespace.com/careers/jobs/786411,New York,Software / Systems Engineer Intern - Site Reliability
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Position Description

SRC, Inc. is currently seeking electrical engineers graduating in May 2019 to design, develop and test leading-edge radar and communications systems. We are looking for engineers to join our high-performing teams and develop creative solutions to help solve difficult technical problems.

Responsibilities


Implement signal processing and data analysis algorithms (e.g. trackers, detectors) and graphical user interfaces (GUIs) in MATLAB and Python
Reverse engineer UAS (or drone) radio-frequency (RF) communications using real-time spectrum analyzers
Design system parameters and hardware settings necessary for our radars and software-defined radios to meet their performance requirements
Evaluate performance of RF systems u sing anechoic chambers
Travel to customer sites and government test ranges to perform field testing of electronic systems
Analyze and characterize communication link and radar performance
Validate software models on military grade hardware using equipment such as real-time spectrum analyzers, vector signal generators, high speed oscilloscopes and network analyzers

Position Requirements
Working towards bachelor's degree in computer engineering or electrical engineering, graduating May 2019
Minimum grade point average of 3.0
Students with degrees in mathematics or physics will be considered depending on academic and intern experience
Comfortable learning new skills and technologies
Able to use creative and analytical skills for problem solving
Interested in signal processing, electromagnetics, digital design, electronics, radars, communications, or RF design
Capable of working on teams across multiple disciplines to achieve common goals
Proficient with data analysis tools (e.g. MATLAB, Octave, MathCAD, Simulink) plus show interest in optimizing challenging problems via scripting tools (e.g. Python, Perl)
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, with the ability to explain complex problems to both technical and non-technical teammates alike
10 percent travel may be required

Preferred Requirements
Experience with MATLAB

Security Clearance Requirements

Must be a U.S. citizen. Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.

As an EEO/AA employer, the Company does not discriminate in its employment practices due to an applicant or employee’s race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, veteran or disability status, or any other basis protected by federal law. In addition, the Company complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the Company has facilities and employees.",software intern python,,New York,Electrical Engineer (May 2019 Graduates)
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Applications are due by December 14, 2018 at 11:59pm PT. Applications will be reviewed on a rolling basis and it's in the candidate's best interest to apply early. Thank you for your patience while we consider your application.

Note: By applying to this position your application is automatically submitted to the following locations: Mountain View, CA, USA; Boulder, CO, USA; Cambridge, MA, USA; Chicago, IL, USA; Irvine, CA, USA; Kirkland, WA, USA; Los Angeles, CA, USA; New York, NY, USA; San Bruno, CA, USA; Seattle, WA, USA; San Francisco, CA, USA; Sunnyvale, CA, USA; Madison, WI, USA; Pittsburgh, PA, USA

Join us for a unique 12-14 week paid internship that offers personal and professional development, an executive speaker series, and community-building. This program will give you an opportunity to work on complex computer science solutions, to develop scalable, distributed software systems, and also to collaborate on multitudes of smaller projects that have universal appeal - which requires research, awareness, interactivity, and the ability to ask the right questions.

This application is intended for candidates who are eligible for work authorization in the United States upon completing their education. For internship opportunities in the location where you are eligible for work authorization, please check google.com/students.

Depending On Your Background And Experience, You Will Be Working In One Of The Following Areas

From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, Social to Local, Google Engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another. We focus on being a collaborative, global organization consisting of engineers who are ready to address some of technology's greatest challenges. As a Software Engineering Intern, you will work on our core products and services as well as those which support key functions of our engineering operations.

Product and Systems Development

Whether it's finding new and innovative ways to advance search quality, building computing platform and networking technologies, automating the indexing of videos, or continuing to refine and scale complex auction systems (just to name a few), you will be developing solutions to some of the most technical challenges out there. You will research, conceive and develop software applications to extend and improve on Google's product offerings, and collaborate on scalability issues involving access to massive amounts of data and information. Examples of specialist domains include: UI development with AJAX and similar technologies, security, embedded systems and mobile apps (Android), developer tools (IDEs, large-scale build systems, compilers).

Engineering Productivity

As a Software Engineer in the Engineering Productivity organization, you'll use your software design, analysis and programming skills to create innovative automated test systems. The test team undertakes a broad range of challenges on a daily basis, designing and building intelligent systems that can explore various use cases and scenarios for distributed computing infrastructure. Just imagine trying to design and build an automated testing system for something that's never been done before.

Site Reliability

Software Engineers working in Site Reliability are involved in every facet of Google's production and work on the cutting edge of cloud-based computing. As a member of this team, you are in the thick of everything involved with keeping Google running, from code-level troubleshooting of traffic anomalies to maintenance of our most cutting-edge services; from monitoring and alerts to building new automation infrastructure. Software Engineers on this team love to create robust and scalable software that scales to tens of millions of users. You will handle challenging, novel situations every day, and work with just about every other Engineering and Operations team to provide services and applications that are quintessentially Google - fast, reliable and accessible to all.

Google is and always will be an engineering company. We hire people with a broad set of technical skills who are ready to take on some of technology's greatest challenges and make an impact on millions, if not billions, of users. At Google, engineers not only revolutionize search, they routinely work on massive scalability and storage solutions, large-scale applications and entirely new platforms for developers around the world. From Google Ads to Chrome, Android to YouTube, Social to Local, Google engineers are changing the world one technological achievement after another.

Responsibilities
Apply knowledge gained in computer science courses to real-world challenges.
Analyze information and evaluate results to choose the best solution to effectively solve challenges.
Develop scripts to automate routine tasks.
Create and support a productive and innovative team. This includes working with peers, managers, and teams.


Qualifications

Minimum qualifications:
Currently enrolled in a Bachelor's or Master's degree program in Computer Science or related technical field.
Experience with Data Structures or Algorithms gathered from: completing a data structures or algorithms class, coursework, course projects, research, individual projects, internships, or other practical experience inside or outside of school or work (including open source hobby coding).
Experience in Software Development and coding in a general purpose programming language.
Examples of coding in one of the following programming languages including but not limited to: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, or Python.


Preferred Qualifications
Authorization to legally work in the United States.
Returning to or enrolling in a Master's degree program after completion of the internship.
Experience programming in two or more of the languages including but not limited to: C, C++, C#, Java, JavaScript, Go or Python.
Experience working with some of the following: web application development, Unix/Linux environments, mobile application development, distributed and parallel systems, machine learning, information retrieval, natural language processing, networking, developing large software systems, and/or security software development.
Demonstrated interest and ability to learn other coding languages as needed.
Excellent communication skills, with the ability to speak and write in English.


At Google, we don’t just accept difference - we celebrate it, we support it, and we thrive on it for the benefit of our employees, our products and our community. Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.

To all recruitment agencies Google does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Google employees or any other company location. Google is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",software intern python,https://careers.google.com/jobs/results/4672100797054976-software-engineering-intern-ms-summer-2019/?src=Online%2FLinkedIn%2Flinkedin_us&utm_campaign=contract&utm_medium=jobposting&utm_source=linkedin,New York,"Software Engineering Intern, MS, Summer 2019"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Software Engineer - Intern

At Broadway, we strive to build the next generation of thought leaders. As pioneers within our industry, we scour the globe to find outside-the-box thinkers, enthusiastic crafters, and brilliant self-starters—people who are naturally compelled to figure out what works, what doesn’t, and why. We focus on the things that matter. No stuffy corporate office. No dress code or business attire (unless that’s your thing). We build amazing software with some of the greatest thinkers around the world, and we love doing it.

Your role….

Spend your summer with us in New York City! Our intern program will begin transforming what you have learned in the classroom into skills necessary to become a professional software engineer. No pushing paper or filling coffee mugs here. Our top execs and technical experts will teach you what we do and how we do it. You’ll work directly on the frontlines as part of the development team, creating and releasing Broadway product to our customers.

Responsibilities
Work in C#, JavaScript and related frameworks (Vue, Angular and React) to design, implement and deliver an exceptional UX experience for Broadway’s distributed Front-end applications.
Work in C++ and Python to design, implement, and release state-of-the-art components and applications for mission-critical, high performance, globally distributed systems related to automated trading
Produce exemplary code and deliver completed projects on time
Perform unit and system level testing on your application and all affected systems
Work closely with customer-facing technical consultants to ensure that development efforts truly meet customer needs
Work closely with technical leads to ensure effective coordination and integration between interrelated projects

Traits
Self-starter with ability to self-regulate and problem solve independently through obstacles in a dynamic, fast-paced environment
Results driven with a strong ownership mentality and drive to deliver on schedule; maintains realistic estimations and escalates proactively when necessary
Superior abstract thinking abilities
Motivated to learn about new industries, master new technologies, and push technological boundaries
Connects code to the business problems being solved and translates effectively across business and technical boundaries
Team player who openly shares information, helps others, and is open to new ideas and “going the extra mile” when needed

Additional Details
Monthly housing stipend given to all interns
Roundtrip travel to and from New York City
Free lunch, snacks and drinks every work day
More about us…
Broadway Technology is a software company that builds and sells low-latency distributed systems, primarily for use in financial applications like trading bonds, fiat currencies, and cryptocurrencies. Our software has powered the world’s most critical systems at top financial institutions for almost 15 years and controls well over $125 trillion in business annually.

Broadway connects people and markets all over the world. We make trading financial assets easier, faster, safer, and smarter. Don’t know finance? (Maybe just skeptical?) That’s okay! We’d love to teach you about this surprisingly innovative, wonderfully interesting, and globally important space. Diverse experiences and an openness to learn are essential to push the boundaries of financial technology.

We’re at an exciting stage and growing fast (already @ 160+ employees). In May 2017, we won $42 million in funding to expand worldwide and pursue next-generation projects across our entire technology stack. Join our team and contribute to our unfolding story.",software intern python,https://university-broadwaytechnology.icims.com/jobs/1279/software-engineer-%e2%80%93-intern-%28summer-2019%29/job?mode=job&iis=Job+Posting&iisn=LinkedIn&mobile=false&width=680&height=500&bga=true&needsRedirect=false&jan1offset=-420&jun1offset=-360,New York,Software Engineer – Intern (Summer 2019)
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Job Description

START AND END DATES FOR THIS INTERNSHIP ARE DURING SUMMER 2019 (3 months)

At IBM we have an amazing opportunity to transform the world with cognitive technology. By using the vast amounts of information available today to identify new patterns and make new discoveries, we are helping cities become smarter, hospitals transform patient care, financial institutions minimize risk, and pharmaceuticals find cures for rare diseases. Join the forward-thinking teams at IBM solving some of the world’s most complex problems – there is no better place to grow your career!

Sr. Cognitive Software Developer Interns
Create and maintain machine learning models with a focus on big data.
Work in Agile, collaborative environments to understand and develop solutions for requirements. This includes designing, coding and testing innovative applications in areas such as machine learning, computational linguistics, Natural Language Processing (NLP), advanced and semantic information search, extraction, induction, classification and exploration.
Assist with implementing, testing and improving algorithms
Employ IBM Design Thinking to create products that provide a great user experience along with high performance, security, quality, and stability.
Are great at solving problems, debugging, troubleshooting, designing and implementing solutions to complex technical issues.
Have a basic understanding of software development and programming in a language such as Java or Python.
Have an interest in, understanding of, or experience with Design Thinking Methodology
Have an interest in, understanding of, or experience with Agile development methodology
Sr. Cognitive Software Developer Interns are in demand across IBM's growth areas. You'll be matched and deployed to a development team in a strategic business, based on your offered location and fit. These are office-based positions in IBM locations including:

AZ – Phoenix
CA - Almaden, Costa Mesa*, Emeryville, Foster City, Redwood City, San Francisco*, San Jose
CO - Denver*
GA – Atlanta
MA - Cambridge, Littleton
MN – Rochester
NC - Raleigh, Durham
NY - New York City*, North Castle*, Poughkeepsie, Yorktown Heights
OH - Cleveland, Dublin, Hartland
OR - Hillsboro*
PA - Blue Bell, Pittsburgh*
TX - Austin, Dallas
VT - Essex Junction*

Opportunities in all locations will vary based on business demand
cities with limited opportunities

What You’ll Do
You will create and maintain machine learning models with a focus on big data.
You’ll work in an Agile, collaborative environment to understand and develop solutions for requirements. This includes designing, coding and testing innovative applications in areas such as machine learning, computational linguistics, Natural Language Processing (NLP), advanced and semantic information search, extraction, induction, classification and exploration.
You’ll assist with implementing, testing and improving algorithms in these areas, and will proactively identify and file patentable technology.
You’ll employ IBM Design Thinking to create products that provide a great user experience along with high performance, security, quality, and stability.

Who You Are
You are great at solving problems, debugging, troubleshooting, designing and implementing solutions to complex technical issues.
You thrive on collaboration, working side by side with developers and scientists of all backgrounds and disciplines, and you have very strong verbal and written communication skills.
You have some awareness of knowledge representation and reasoning. You have a basic understanding of software development and programming in a language such as Java or Python.

Required Technical and Professional Expertise
Must have basic knowledge in one of the following technology areas: Java or Python.

Preferred Tech And Prof Experience
Willing to travel up to 10%
Bachelors or Masters Degree

EO Statement
IBM is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. IBM is also committed to compliance with all fair employment practices regarding citizenship and immigration status.",software intern python,,New York,Sr. Cognitive Software Developer Intern Summer 2019
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Company Description Kitware, Inc. (www.kitware.com) creates and supports leading edge, high quality software in the fields of computer vision, medical imaging, visualization, 3D data publishing, and technical software development. Kitware employs an open source development model to foster extended, collaborative communities, and an open source business model to provide flexible, high-quality technical solutions.
Kitware is seeking to hire Research and Development Web Developer Intern for our Data and Analytics team, to work on open source, scalable web and distributed processing projects, analytics, data science, and visualizations. We do most of our development in a combination of Python and JavaScript.

Required Skills
Python or JavaScript programming, preferably both
B.S., M.S., or Ph.D. students in computer science, computer engineering, math, physics, statistics or a related field
Demonstrated software development expertise, e.g., active github account, successful school or co-op project, or documented open-source contribution
Enthusiasm for programming, learning, problem solving, and tracking technology trends
Exceptional collaboration and communication skills
Understanding of algorithms, computer systems, programming language constructs, and design patterns
Desired Skills
Our primary need is for interns with web software development experience, including REST services, web application security, client side HTML, CSS, and modern JavaScript (es6, webpack, grunt, npm) as well as web server components such as Apache, Node.js, Django, Flask or CherryPy is highly desirable
Familiarity with high-quality software practices, such as test-driven development, revision control (git), documentation, software review and continuous integration processes (Jenkins, Travis, CircleCI), and cross-platform support
Data science tools, including NumPy, Pandas, Jupyter/IPython, R, machine learning tools, data cleaning tools
Cloud services and dev-ops, including Docker, Amazon Web Services, and provisioning tools, e.g., Ansible, Puppet, Chef, etc.
User interface design for Qt or Web applications
Web visualization technologies such as D3, WebGL, and HTML5 Canvas
Databases like MySQL, SQLite, PostGres, and NoSQL databases, e.g., Mongo, Redis, Cassandra
Additional Information Kitware’s Computer Vision group is distributed between our two offices in Clifton Park near Albany, NY, and Carrboro near Chapel Hill, NC. Interns at the Clifton Park headquarters will enjoy visiting beautiful and vibrant nearby locations including Niagara Falls, Boston, New York City, Montreal, and there are numerous outdoor music concerts and festivals during summer in the nearby area. Compensation is competitive and work schedules are flexible within an open atmosphere which encourages collaboration.
Kitware actively subscribes to a policy of equal employment opportunity. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, protected veteran status, uniformed service member status, or any other characteristics protected by applicable law.",software intern python,https://hire.withgoogle.com/public/jobs/kitwarecom/view/P_AAAAAADAAEiMbvxMg223SX?eqp=Advantage_Network&eqi=59657,New York,R&D Web Developer Intern - Data and Analytics
2018-11-15,,"Job description
This job has been posted by Stella.ai on behalf of one of our clients.
The Software Engineering Intern will join the ranks to take on practical problems in a world-class engineering environment while being mentored by some of the most talented engineers in the industry. This position is based in Brooklyn, NY.

Description

Our client is on the lookout for the next generation of technology leaders to take on projects that will impact millions of users globally. We have opportunities to join teams working on public-facing features as well as dev tools and core infrastructure at our HQ in Brooklyn, NY.

Please note: Resumes without a cover letter will not be considered!

About The Team

The technical staff at Our client believes that code is craft, good software and systems designs are works of art, and that the work we do is part of larger creative culture represented by the hundreds of thousands of inspired creative entrepreneurs who make Our client such a wondrous marketplace. We believe that small, empowered, self-motivated teams can do big things. We also believe in the right tool for the job, not language-as-religion. Our current systems run PHP, Java, Python, Ruby, Solr/Lucene, Postgres, MySQL, and more. Check out our Engineering blog:(Website)/

About The Job

You'll be helping us build new and awesome experiences for people buying and selling on Our client. We're looking for full-stack engineers - you'll be dealing with the MySQL, Memcache, PHP, and front-end stuff (HTML/CSS/JS). The teams working on each feature are pretty small (a few engineers, a designer, and a product manager), so there's a lot of meaningful collaboration.

Because we're making user-facing features, we believe strongly in collecting and analyzing numerical data to help guide our decisions. To that end, you'll be able to use our in-house analytics tools to gather information and gain insights. You'll also be able to use Our client's Continuous Deployment architecture to push code to production whenever you please (and you'll probably push on your first day here).

This is a paid internship that includes a generous housing stipend.

About You

You’re tenacious, driven, and have a passion for learning. You love to collaborate and have meaningful interactions with everyone you meet. You enjoy the rush of taking a risk and the satisfaction of having an experiment work as you expected. You believe in the connective power of Our client’s peer-to-peer marketplace, and want to create the code that will make it stronger.

You Will Be Successful In This Role If You
Have excellent written and verbal communication skills
Can be autonomous and self-driven
Get inspired on a daily basis, think of new ideas and like to share them with others
Take pleasure in making things, momentum, chaos, vibrancy, spontaneity, debate and silence
What’s Next

Interested in working with us? Send us a cover letter and your resume explaining why you’d be great for the job. We value your unique talents and point of view, so feel free to tell us what you are all about. And if you write, draw, craft, or contribute to something you’re proud of, we’d love to hear about it.

At Our client, we believe that a diverse, equitable and inclusive workplace makes us a more relevant, more competitive, and more resilient company. We welcome people from all backgrounds, ethnicities, cultures, and experiences. Our client is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, ancestry, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital or family status, disability, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other legally protected status.",software intern python,https://www.stella.ai/jobs/H67pUbU4rwrHXMmUbCTbMo?company=lip&co=etsy,New York,Software Engineering Internship - Summer 2019
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Nekki LLC is an international company, with operations in the U.S. and Latin America.

We provide services of Technology, Business Consulting, and Corporate Communications for many major clients around the world.

We are looking for a proactive, responsible and creative Software Engineer Intern who wants to make his/her internship with us.

You are going to learn a lot with us developing new technologies with Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, and Deep Learning. And you could be part of a further full-time opportunity by the end of the internship.

Responsibilities
Execute full lifecycle software development.
Design, code and debug applications in various software languages.
Integrate software components into functional software system.
Prepare and install solutions by determining and designing system specifications, standards, and programming.
Deploy software tools, processes and metrics.
Support, maintain and document software functionality.
Develop software verification plans and quality assurance process.
Evaluate and identify new technologies for implementation.
Requirements
Ability to develop software in C#, Java, JavaScript, PHP, Python or other selected languages
Advanced skills in software engineering tools
Experience in developing mobile and web applications
Knowledge of software development methodology and release processes
Ability to document requirements and specifications
Strong organizational, planning and time management skills
Advanced attention to detail and problem solving skills
Solid communication skills (written and verbal)
BS degree in Computer Science, Engineering or equivalent
**Important**
Please send us an email with your resume to ajaldin@nekki.us, and give us a sense of why you want to get into Machine Learning, and what you have already done to demonstrate your interest.",software intern python,https://www.internships.com/software/Unpaid-Software-Engineer-Fall-Internship,New York,Unpaid Software Engineer - Fall Internship
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Tumblr launched in 2007 with the belief that people need a place to say what they want, be who they want, and connect over what they love. We continue to build out Tumblr as a platform for free expression, individuality, and human connection. That's why we need smart, humble, funny people to keep Tumblr growing. We're big enough to give you the resources you need and still small enough that you can work on things that matter. Come work with us.

Oath, a subsidiary of Verizon, is a values-led company committed to building brands that people love - that is built by taking Yahoo and AOL, fusing them and producing massive media and technology company operating at massive global scale. Tumblr, an integral part of Oath - through Yahoo - sits at the intersection of technology, trends and expression. Tumblr provides the unique opportunity of working as a Start up engineer inside an established technology giant in New York City.

We build and manage platforms for petabytes of data, Tens of thousands of events per second streaming data, and provides machine learning platforms for forecasting, user behavior projections with machine learning. We are looking for interns to take on well defined, self contained problems and contribute in this space, this summer. Interns are individual contributors to the organization. Through compelling data mining, machining learning, and visualization algorithms, they gain knowledge and make decisions from data, and help our company to build better and more secure platforms products. Working alongside top engineers across Oath, the internships will be based in New York City.

On a Typical Day, The Interns Would

We have exciting job openings for Summer Interns who are ready to make a significant impact - specifically in the back end engineering platforms, products and services for Tumblr's Engineering platforms.
Design, develop, code and test software systems or applications for software enhancements and new products; revise and refine as required
Participate in agile development of project timelines, implementation design specifications, system flow diagrams, documentation, testing and ongoing support of systems
Qualifications
Actively enrolled in a BS, MS, or PhD Program in Computer Science or related major, and strong record of academic achievement
Knowledge of software engineering processes, tools (e.g.: programming proficiency in a language, preferably Java, C/C++, methods, test development, support, algorithms and data structure
Familiarity with object-oriented programming concepts, large-scale software architecture, networking and distributed systems, and UNIX/Linux environments Experience in one or many of the following is a plus:
Familiarity with Java, PHP, Python
Familiarity with Machine Learning algorithms and technologies.
Experience building or maintaining databases (MySQL, Hive, etc.)
Experience building or maintaining Big data & streaming systems (Hadoop, HDFS, Kafka, etc.)
Cross-platform coding
Security
Large-scale, large-user base website development experience
Data mining, machine learning, AI, statistics, information retrieval, linguistic analysis
Strong mathematical background
Oath is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to, and will not be discriminated against based on, age, race, gender, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability or any other protected category. Oath is dedicated to providing an accessible environment for all candidates during the application process and for employees during their employment. Please let us know if you need a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job or participate in the application process.

Oath is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to, and will not be discriminated against based on, age, race, gender, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability or any other protected category. Oath is dedicated to providing an accessible environment for all candidates during the application process and for employees during their employment. Please let us know if you need a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job or participate in the application process.

Currently work for Oath? Please apply on our internal career site.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/38861cc0e8896207b0b22cff8bda3315,New York,Software Engineering Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
InternshipJoin us to do the best work of your life.
At frog we are united by our shared passion for outcomes that transform the human experience. We accomplish these outcomes by taking on complex challenges, big asks, and things that have never been done before. We look beyond point solutions and apply design to the creation of new strategies, systems, and—in some cases—entirely new businesses. We know that takes all types of people. We believe that diverse backgrounds and experiences creates a stronger frog.
Our work is transformational because our people are extraordinary. frogs are analytical and artistic, conservative and unconventional, technical and whimsical. We look for hybrid talents and build teams around divergent expertise, which allows us to solve problems and uncover opportunities in unique ways. frogs are some of the best talent in the world, and together we advance the human experience through design.
The Position**: Design Technologist Intern
Winter Design Technologist Intern
New York Studio
Start Date**: 1/28/19
End Date**: 4/5/19
We are looking for exceptional interns to join our creative teams. Interns are treated like full time employees in the studio and work on active programs with project teams. The winter internships are paid and run for 10 weeks.
For an application to be considered, please submit the following documents:
Resume
Cover Letter
Portfolio or Github URL
The Contribution**:
Intern Design Technologists at frog play the role of part futurist and part pragmatist while being a hands-on and organizer of technical insights, experiments, proofs, and models that bridge the gap between creative design services and software architecture and engineering as part of the successful delivery of innovative solutions for our clients. As a Design Technologist Intern, you will be assisting in driving technology platform research and experimentation, concept exploration, prototyping, and ideation within the creative process for designing user experiences in software. You will help to identify and analyze current and future UX technology patterns and trends, perform in-depth investigation and experimentation with emerging platforms and frameworks, and identify new opportunities and business value for UX innovation and differentiation with technology enablers. You collaborate closely with the creative organization to express design assets and artifacts in the form of user experience simulations, interactive prototypes, technical proof-of-concepts, and UI/presentation layer.
You are a maker and a tinkerer. You are not afraid to get your hands dirty, and you like challenges. You are creative, and technology is your medium.
You Are**:
You Bring To The Organization The Following Competencies

Someone who wants to influence your own development. You're looking for a company where you have the opportunity to pursue your interests across functions and geographies, and where a job title is not considered the final definition of who you are, but the starting point.
Currently enrolled in a relevant degree seeking program (either graduate or undergraduate)
A dedicated and talented technologist who understands the value of design and future-thinking.
Detail oriented, hard working, self motivated, and proactive
Understanding of :
User interface design, user experience and information architecture
Fundamentals of computer science, data structures, and algorithms
Software design patterns, principals and best practices
Iterative prototyping and/or product realization
You are comfortable in one or more of the following areas:
Frontend HTML5 web development (JS/CSS/HTML). Full stack experience is a huge plus.
Databases and data manipulation
Mobile development (iOS and/or Android)
Creative coding for a screen in C++, Python, or your language of choice.
Physical computing, basic electronic prototyping
Data science and machine learning",software intern python,,New York,Design Technologist Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
As a Software Engineering Intern at Enigma, you'll work alongside a brilliant team of other curious, data-obsessed co-workers, who want to share the magic that Enigma products can bring to a customer. We build products to ingest large, diverse datasets, map them to ontologies, probabilistically identify likely connections, and then use these knowledge graphs to power applications to create transformative value - from saving lives to preventing financial crime. By applying Enigma technologies to real-world industry challenges, engineers at Enigma are responsible for enabling next-generation business processes for blue chip clients, one workflow, process, or team at a time. Software engineers are guided by four principles: ""Always be shipping,"" ""Customer obsession,"" ""Strive for perfect,"" and ""Think big, start small."" Ultimately, we are excited about data's impact on the world and are looking for engineers who are curious, generous and can hustle in a fast-paced environment.

Qualities We Value
Comfortable using the right tool for the job, rather than any sticky preference for a tool or technology
Motivated by working on hard problems with smart people
Enjoy learning and sharing your valuable feedback across our engineering teams, so we can continue to iterate and improve
Highly motivated, results-oriented, and take pride in being a problem solver
Qualifications
Experience in one or more of {Python, Go, Scala, Java}
Comfortable developing for/in a Linux environment (regardless of distribution)
2019 and 2020 graduates are encouraged to apply if you are self-directed, seek out new responsibility, and strive for excellence
Projects We Work On:Products

We are constantly building and improving the Enigma product suite. Our products range from scalable data systems to orchestration of complex Machine Learning pipelines. We're improving existing products for Fortune 500 customers, and providing the Enigma toolbox to hundreds of analysts and investigators. At the same time, new products are in the works to intelligently link and serve large, disparate, structured and unstructured data to our users.

See our work in action: Simplifying Sanctions in Compliance and Mapping NYC Restaurant Grades.

Machine Learning

One of the core pillars of Software Engineering at Enigma is Machine Learning, and its impact ranges from powering important products to envelope-pushing algorithms. Not only are we using Machine Learning in each of our products, but we're also expanding the boundaries on research areas like Entity Resolution, Agent Simulations and Predicting Human Behavior.

Read about how we improved entity resolution with SOFT TF IDF algorithm.

Data Engineering

Enigma's first set of products was built to power Enigma Public: managing, crawling, linking, and monitoring data systems that power the broadest public data repository on the Internet. The challenges of public data are more demanding than ever, as data origins, types, available languages increase exponentially.

Our Story

Enigma is a rapidly growing enterprise technology company based in the Flatiron neighborhood of New York City. We are Series B funded, partnering with some of the best investors in the world: New Enterprise Associates, Two Sigma Ventures, Comcast Ventures, Crosslink Capital, American Express Ventures, and others.

Founded in 2012, Enigma was started based on the realization that there was tremendous potential in using public data to understand how the world works, but that it was untapped because the data is highly fragmented and disconnected. Enigma set out to change that by building and organizing one of the largest collections of public data in the world, and our big coming out party was winning TechCrunch Disrupts Battlefield in 2013. Our vision has remained steadfast, we want to empower people to interpret, and improve, the world around them. However, we have expanded our ability to realize this vision by combining our massive public data repository with an ecosystem of software and tools designed to link, resolve, enhance and apply data to help global-scale companies take on some of their hardest problems, ranging from preventing money laundering to ensuring patient safety.

We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or veteran status.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/31fe790f54c656d9db477db4e008a02f,New York,"Software Engineering Intern, Summer 2019"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
At 3M, we apply science in collaborative ways to improve lives. With $32 billion in sales, our 91,000 employees connect with customers all around the world.

3M has a long-standing reputation as a company committed to innovation. We provide the freedom to explore and encourage curiosity and creativity. We gain new insight from diverse thinking, and take risks on new ideas.

Here, you can apply your talent in bold ways that matter.

Job Description

3M is seeking a Software Development Intern for the Health Information Systems Division Summer of 2019 located in Albany NY.

3M Health Information Systems (HIS) is the world leader for innovating the language of health and delivers comprehensive software and consulting services. Working at 3M Health Information Systems you will be helping with today's challenges, while preparing for tomorrow's.

We transform ideas into products and services that help customers add efficiency to their operations and, in turn, deliver better service to patients. The magic of 3M innovation happens when smart, creative people collaborate to break new ground, solve a problem or create a solution that improves or saves lives.

As an intern, you can grow through challenging work, get involved in meaningful projects and receive great coaching from our leaders. Here, you can apply your talent in bold ways that matter.

The internship position is a temporary position within 3M. Interns typically work a full-time schedule of 40 hours a week throughout a 10-14-week assignment starting in May of 2019.

Note: Applications are reviewed on a rolling basis. It is in a candidate's best interest to apply early. Most hiring decisions will be made by January 2019.

Primary Responsibilities include but are not limited to the following:
Assists with the design and creation of software applications as a member of a team of software developers
Performs triage and resolution of software defects
Assists with the creation of enhancements to software in accordance with feature specifications
Conducts software tests in adherence with quality standards
May participate in the design and planning of new features
Keeps team members apprised of project status
Performs other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications
Currently pursuing a Bachelor's degree or higher from an accredited University
Currently possess a cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher on a 4.0 scale
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with SQL and relational database concepts
Knowledge of scripting including Python
Knowledge of object oriented programming with languages such as Java or C#
Strong time management skills and the initiative to resolve problems by communicating promptly and driving project forward is required
Strong interpersonal skills and judgment in order to interact effectively with a broad spectrum of people, both individually and in groups is required
Must be a creative and original thinker
Must have the ability to work effectively with close supervision
The successful candidate will exhibit professionalism, initiative, sound judgment, dependability, and a strong work ethic
Location: Albany NY

Relocation: Is not authorized

Must be legally authorized to work in country of employment without sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g., H1B, Curricular Practical Training (CPT) or Optional Practical Training (OPT))

Diverse & Inclusive 3M

3M is a place where you can collaborate with other curious, creative people. Where your diverse talents, inclusiveness, initiative and leadership are valued. Where you'll find challenging opportunities that make your career exciting and rewarding. With a diversity of people, global locations, technologies and products, 3M is a place to grow and be rewarded for excellence.

About 3M

At 3M, we apply science in collaborative ways to improve lives daily. With $30 billion in sales, our 90,000 employees connect with customers all around the world. Learn more about 3M's creative solutions to the world's problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M or @3MNewsroom.

Here, you go! For information about a career at 3M go directly to www.3m.com/careers.

Work with the Best and the Brightest, our culture.

3M is a giant melting pot of smart, motivated people. Here, you will discover an inclusive culture and will collaborate with other curious, creative minds. Our huge array of global locations, technologies and products provides many pathways to a rewarding career. We give you the flexibility to help balance your work life with your personal life.

3M Ethic's.

Most Recent great-news / Awards: 3M received recognition as being A Most Ethical Company! Promoting Ethical Business standards and practices internally, enabling managers and employees to make good choices, and shaping future industry standards by introducing tomorrow's best practices today. Honorees have historically out-performed others financially, demonstrating the connection between good ethical practices and performances that's valued. To View this recognition, please visit: http://bit.ly/EthisphereWorldsMostEthicalCompanyAward

Learn more about 3M's creative solutions to the world's problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M.

3M is an equal opportunity employer. 3M will not discriminate against any applicant for employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.

Please note: your application may not be considered if you do not provide your education and work history, either by: 1) uploading a resume, or 2) entering the information into the application fields directly.

3M Global Terms of Use and Privacy Statement

Carefully read these Terms of Use before using this website. Your access to and use of this website and application for a job at 3M are conditioned on your acceptance and compliance with these terms.

Please access the linked document by clicking here, select the country where you are applying for employment, and review. Before submitting your application you will be asked to confirm your agreement with the terms.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/6cde44af3d8e9c9ce2184a41d29b34db,New York,"3M HIS Software Development Intern (AWS/Python/Java) - (Albany, NY)"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
At 3M, we apply science in collaborative ways to improve lives. With $32 billion in sales, our 91,000 employees connect with customers all around the world.

3M has a long-standing reputation as a company committed to innovation. We provide the freedom to explore and encourage curiosity and creativity. We gain new insight from diverse thinking, and take risks on new ideas.

Here, you can apply your talent in bold ways that matter.

Job Description

3M is seeking a Software Development Intern for the Health Information Systems Division Summer of 2019 located in Albany NY.

3M Health Information Systems (HIS) is the world leader for innovating the language of health and delivers comprehensive software and consulting services. Working at 3M Health Information Systems you will be helping with today's challenges, while preparing for tomorrow's.

We transform ideas into products and services that help customers add efficiency to their operations and, in turn, deliver better service to patients. The magic of 3M innovation happens when smart, creative people collaborate to break new ground, solve a problem or create a solution that improves or saves lives.

As an intern, you can grow through challenging work, get involved in meaningful projects and receive great coaching from our leaders. Here, you can apply your talent in bold ways that matter.

The internship position is a temporary position within 3M. Interns typically work a full-time schedule of 40 hours a week throughout a 10-14-week assignment starting in May of 2019.

Note: Applications are reviewed on a rolling basis. It is in a candidate's best interest to apply early. Most hiring decisions will be made by January 2019.

Primary Responsibilities include but are not limited to the following:
Assists with the design and creation of software applications as a member of a team of software developers
Performs triage and resolution of software defects
Assists with the creation of enhancements to software in accordance with feature specifications
Conducts software tests in adherence with quality standards
May participate in the design and planning of new features
Keeps team members apprised of project status
Performs other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications
Currently pursuing a Bachelor's degree or higher from an accredited University
Currently possess a cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher on a 4.0 scale
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with SQL and relational database concepts
Knowledge of scripting including Python
Knowledge of object oriented programming with languages such as Java or C#
Strong time management skills and the initiative to resolve problems by communicating promptly and driving project forward is required
Strong interpersonal skills and judgment in order to interact effectively with a broad spectrum of people, both individually and in groups is required
Must be a creative and original thinker
Must have the ability to work effectively with close supervision
The successful candidate will exhibit professionalism, initiative, sound judgment, dependability, and a strong work ethic
Location: Albany NY

Relocation: Is not authorized

Must be legally authorized to work in country of employment without sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g., H1B, Curricular Practical Training (CPT) or Optional Practical Training (OPT))

Diverse & Inclusive 3M

3M is a place where you can collaborate with other curious, creative people. Where your diverse talents, inclusiveness, initiative and leadership are valued. Where you'll find challenging opportunities that make your career exciting and rewarding. With a diversity of people, global locations, technologies and products, 3M is a place to grow and be rewarded for excellence.

About 3M

At 3M, we apply science in collaborative ways to improve lives daily. With $30 billion in sales, our 90,000 employees connect with customers all around the world. Learn more about 3M's creative solutions to the world's problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M or @3MNewsroom.

Here, you go! For information about a career at 3M go directly to www.3m.com/careers.

Work with the Best and the Brightest, our culture.

3M is a giant melting pot of smart, motivated people. Here, you will discover an inclusive culture and will collaborate with other curious, creative minds. Our huge array of global locations, technologies and products provides many pathways to a rewarding career. We give you the flexibility to help balance your work life with your personal life.

3M Ethic's.

Most Recent great-news / Awards: 3M received recognition as being A Most Ethical Company! Promoting Ethical Business standards and practices internally, enabling managers and employees to make good choices, and shaping future industry standards by introducing tomorrow's best practices today. Honorees have historically out-performed others financially, demonstrating the connection between good ethical practices and performances that's valued. To View this recognition, please visit: http://bit.ly/EthisphereWorldsMostEthicalCompanyAward

Learn more about 3M's creative solutions to the world's problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M.

3M is an equal opportunity employer. 3M will not discriminate against any applicant for employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.

Please note: your application may not be considered if you do not provide your education and work history, either by: 1) uploading a resume, or 2) entering the information into the application fields directly.

3M Global Terms of Use and Privacy Statement

Carefully read these Terms of Use before using this website. Your access to and use of this website and application for a job at 3M are conditioned on your acceptance and compliance with these terms.

Please access the linked document by clicking here, select the country where you are applying for employment, and review. Before submitting your application you will be asked to confirm your agreement with the terms.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/18290c2074c88199935930e370f85896,New York,"3M HIS Software Development Intern (SQL, Python) - (Albany, NY)"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
At 3M, we apply science in collaborative ways to improve lives. With $32 billion in sales, our 91,000 employees connect with customers all around the world.

3M has a long-standing reputation as a company committed to innovation. We provide the freedom to explore and encourage curiosity and creativity. We gain new insight from diverse thinking, and take risks on new ideas.

Here, you can apply your talent in bold ways that matter.

Job Description

3M is seeking a Software Development Intern for the Health Information Systems Division Summer of 2019 located in Albany NY.

3M Health Information Systems (HIS) is the world leader for innovating the language of health and delivering comprehensive software and consulting services. Working at 3M Health Information Systems you will be helping with today's challenges, while preparing for tomorrow's.

We transform ideas into products and services that help customers add efficiency to their operations and, in turn, deliver better service to patients. The magic of 3M innovation happens when smart, creative people collaborate to break new ground, solve a problem or create a solution that improves or saves lives.

As an intern, you can grow through challenging work, get involved in meaningful projects and receive great coaching from our leaders. Here, you can apply your talent in bold ways that matter.

The internship position is a temporary position within 3M. Interns typically work a full-time schedule of 40 hours a week throughout a 10-14-week assignment starting in May of 2019.

Note: Applications are reviewed on a rolling basis. It is in a candidate's best interest to apply early. Most hiring decisions will be made by January 2019.

Primary Responsibilities include but are not limited to the following:
Assists with the design and creation of software applications as a member of a team of software developers
Performs triage and resolution of software defects
Assists with the creation of enhancements to software in accordance with feature specifications
Conducts software tests in adherence with quality standards
May participate in the design and planning of new features
Keeps team members apprised of project status
Performs other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications
Currently pursuing a Bachelor's degree or higher from an accredited University
Currently possess a cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher on a 4.0 scale
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with SQL and relational database concepts
Knowledge of scripting including Python
Knowledge of object oriented programming with languages such as Java or C#
Strong time management skills and the initiative to resolve problems by communicating promptly and driving project forward is required
Strong interpersonal skills and judgment in order to interact effectively with a broad spectrum of people, both individually and in groups is required
Must be a creative and original thinker
Must have the ability to work effectively with close supervision
The successful candidate will exhibit professionalism, initiative, sound judgment, dependability, and a strong work ethic
Location: Albany NY

Relocation: Is not authorized

Must be legally authorized to work in country of employment without sponsorship for employment visa status (e.g., H1B, Curricular Practical Training (CPT) or Optional Practical Training (OPT))

Diverse & Inclusive 3M

3M is a place where you can collaborate with other curious, creative people. Where your diverse talents, inclusiveness, initiative and leadership are valued. Where you'll find challenging opportunities that make your career exciting and rewarding. With a diversity of people, global locations, technologies and products, 3M is a place to grow and be rewarded for excellence.

About 3M

At 3M, we apply science in collaborative ways to improve lives daily. With $30 billion in sales, our 90,000 employees connect with customers all around the world. Learn more about 3M's creative solutions to the world's problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M or @3MNewsroom.

Here, you go! For information about a career at 3M go directly to www.3m.com/careers.

Work with the Best and the Brightest, our culture.

3M is a giant melting pot of smart, motivated people. Here, you will discover an inclusive culture and will collaborate with other curious, creative minds. Our huge array of global locations, technologies and products provides many pathways to a rewarding career. We give you the flexibility to help balance your work life with your personal life.

3M Ethic's.

Most Recent great-news / Awards: 3M received recognition as being A Most Ethical Company! Promoting Ethical Business standards and practices internally, enabling managers and employees to make good choices, and shaping future industry standards by introducing tomorrow's best practices today. Honorees have historically out-performed others financially, demonstrating the connection between good ethical practices and performances that's valued. To View this recognition, please visit: http://bit.ly/EthisphereWorldsMostEthicalCompanyAward

Learn more about 3M's creative solutions to the world's problems at www.3M.com or on Twitter @3M.

3M is an equal opportunity employer. 3M will not discriminate against any applicant for employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.

Please note: your application may not be considered if you do not provide your education and work history, either by: 1) uploading a resume, or 2) entering the information into the application fields directly.

3M Global Terms of Use and Privacy Statement

Carefully read these Terms of Use before using this website. Your access to and use of this website and application for a job at 3M are conditioned on your acceptance and compliance with these terms.

Please access the linked document by clicking here, select the country where you are applying for employment, and review. Before submitting your application you will be asked to confirm your agreement with the terms.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/4c29c3f84ce2e3e8e70dafea143360a8,New York,"3M HIS Software Development Intern (SQL, AWS, Java) - Albany, NY"
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Optical Analyst/Software Development Intern
Date:** Nov 9, 2018
Location:** Fairport, NY, US, 14450
Req #:** 34350
Corning is one of the world’s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise inspecialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people’s lives.
Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges.
The Specialty Materials segment manufactures products that provide more than 150 material formulations for glass, glass ceramics and fluoride crystals to meet demand for unique customer needs. Consequently, this segment operates in a wide variety of commercial and industrial markets that include display optics and components, semiconductor optics components, aerospace and defense, astronomy, ophthalmic products, telecommunications components and cover glass that is optimized for portable display devices.

Description

Summer engineering intern position to support the manufacturing and engineering of world-class, high-precision optical systems. This is a dynamic position for an individual to work in Corning's Advanced Optics division. Primary duties will involve developing or refining data analysis algorithms, software, and graphical user interfaces, to support optics-bench data acquisition or processing of data from optical instruments.

Qualifications
Bachelor of Science, Master of Science, or Ph.D. - Junior or Senior year with an overall GPA of 3.0or higher
Optics coursework in geometrical optics, physical optics, and interferometry.
Math coursework in multi-variable calculus and linear algebra.
Experience with detailed engineering or scientific calculations, using programming languages (e.g. Python or C/C++) or numerical/mathematical environments (e.g. MATLAB/Octave or Mathematica).
We need you to have strong organizational skills and be detail oriented.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Are you a self-starter, passionate about optical engineering and have a high level of technical curiosity?
Are you dedicated, open to new ideas and recognized for your flexibility to change?
This position does not support immigration sponsorship.
We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status.
Nearest Major Market:** Rochester",software intern python,http://labor.x1.jobsflag.com/c/jobresults.php?apply=5&affid=209&ci=17&jl=B232662872,New York,Optical Analyst/Software Development Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Optical Analyst/Software Development Intern

Date: Nov 9, 2018

Location: Fairport, NY, US, 14450

Req #: 34350

Corning is one of the world’s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise inspecialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people’s lives.

Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges.

The Specialty Materials segment manufactures products that provide more than 150 material formulations for glass, glass ceramics and fluoride crystals to meet demand for unique customer needs. Consequently, this segment operates in a wide variety of commercial and industrial markets that include display optics and components, semiconductor optics components, aerospace and defense, astronomy, ophthalmic products, telecommunications components and cover glass that is optimized for portable display devices.

Description

Summer engineering intern position to support the manufacturing and engineering of world-class, high-precision optical systems. This is a dynamic position for an individual to work in Corning's Advanced Optics division. Primary duties will involve developing or refining data analysis algorithms, software, and graphical user interfaces, to support optics-bench data acquisition or processing of data from optical instruments.

Qualifications
Bachelor of Science, Master of Science, or Ph.D. - Junior or Senior year with an overall GPA of 3.0or higher
Optics coursework in geometrical optics, physical optics, and interferometry.
Math coursework in multi-variable calculus and linear algebra.
Experience with detailed engineering or scientific calculations, using programming languages (e.g. Python or C/C++) or numerical/mathematical environments (e.g. MATLAB/Octave or Mathematica).
We need you to have strong organizational skills and be detail oriented.
Good written and oral communication skills.

Are you a self-starter, passionate about optical engineering and have a high level of technical curiosity?

Are you dedicated, open to new ideas and recognized for your flexibility to change?

This position does not support immigration sponsorship.

We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status.

Nearest Major Market: Rochester",software intern python,https://corningcareers.dejobs.org/fairport-ny/optical-analystsoftware-development-intern/F4DCEAD27DBB4B49AB8E7E8231BDCC00/job/?utm_campaign=New%20York%20State%20Job%20Bank&utm_source=New%20York%20State%20Job%20Bank-DE&utm_medium=NLX&vs=13,New York,Optical Analyst/Software Development Intern - Corning Incorporated
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Corning is one of the world's leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people's lives.

Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges.

The Specialty Materials segment manufactures products that provide more than 150 material formulations for glass, glass ceramics and fluoride crystals to meet demand for unique customer needs. Consequently, this segment operates in a wide variety of commercial and industrial markets that include display optics and components, semiconductor optics components, aerospace and defense, astronomy, ophthalmic products, telecommunications components and cover glass that is optimized for portable display devices.

Description

Summer engineering intern position to support the manufacturing and engineering of world-class, high-precision optical systems. This is a dynamic position for an individual to work in Corning's Advanced Optics division. Primary duties will involve developing or refining data analysis algorithms, software, and graphical user interfaces, to support optics-bench data acquisition or processing of data from optical instruments.

Qualifications
Bachelor of Science, Master of Science, or Ph.D. - Junior or Senior year with an overall GPA of 3.0 or higher
Optics coursework in geometrical optics, physical optics, and interferometry.
Math coursework in multi-variable calculus and linear algebra.
Experience with detailed engineering or scientific calculations, using programming languages (e.g. Python or C/C++) or numerical/mathematical environments (e.g. MATLAB/Octave or Mathematica).
We need you to have strong organizational skills and be detail oriented.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Are you a self-starter, passionate about optical engineering and have a high level of technical curiosity?

Are you dedicated, open to new ideas and recognized for your flexibility to change?

This position does not support immigration sponsorship.

We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status.

Nearest Major Market: Rochester",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/00f7cf816abc30dd3a472f64ddcc8398,New York,Optical Analyst/Software Development Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
InternshipCorning is one of the world’s leading innovators in materials science. For more than 160 years, Corning has applied its unparalleled expertise in specialty glass, ceramics, and optical physics to develop products that have created new industries and transformed people’s lives.
Corning succeeds through sustained investment in R&D, a unique combination of material and process innovation, and close collaboration with customers to solve tough technology challenges.
The Specialty Materials segment manufactures products that provide more than 150 material formulations for glass, glass ceramics and fluoride crystals to meet demand for unique customer needs. Consequently, this segment operates in a wide variety of commercial and industrial markets that include display optics and components, semiconductor optics components, aerospace and defense, astronomy, ophthalmic products, telecommunications components and cover glass that is optimized for portable display devices.

Description

Summer engineering intern position to support the manufacturing and engineering of world-class, high-precision optical systems. This is a dynamic position for an individual to work in Corning's Advanced Optics division. Primary duties will involve developing or refining data analysis algorithms, software, and graphical user interfaces, to support optics-bench data acquisition or processing of data from optical instruments.

Qualifications
Bachelor of Science, Master of Science, or Ph.D.
Junior or Senior year with an overall GPA of 3.0** **or higher
Optics coursework in geometrical optics, physical optics, and interferometry.
Math coursework in multi-variable calculus and linear algebra.
Experience with detailed engineering or scientific calculations, using programming languages (e.g. Python or C/C++) or numerical/mathematical environments (e.g. MATLAB/Octave or Mathematica).
We need you to have strong organizational skills and be detail oriented.
Good written and oral communication skills.
Are you a self-starter, passionate about optical engineering and have a high level of technical curiosity?
Are you dedicated, open to new ideas and recognized for your flexibility to change?
This position does not support immigration sponsorship.
We prohibit discrimination on the basis of race, color, gender, age, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status or any other legally protected status.
Nearest Major Market**:Rochester",software intern python,https://www.emprego.pt/en/jobs/show/optical-analyst-software-development-intern-fairport/28441657596971439708460096074?utm_medium=feed&utm_source=linkedin,New York,Optical Analyst / Software Development Intern
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Our Company

Virtu is an industry-leading financial technology company. We are experts in global market making and our cutting-edge technology is core to everything we do. We trade in over 35 countries, across 235 financial exchanges and 1 in 4 market orders placed in the U.S. by retail investors are handled by Virtu.Our team is a dedicated group of traders, quants, developers and finance professionals that are inspired by the unique and exciting challenges we solve every day.

OUR CULTURE

Working here, you’ll have a chance to make a difference—no matter where you sit. We are a relatively small and nimble firm which allows for our teams to be engaged with many different aspects of our business. Our culture combines the creativity of a fast paced start up, with the stability of a disciplined financial services firm. We are a flat organization and encourage our people to innovate and lean on their teammates for support and collaboration. We have fun, work hard and strive to be virtuous in all we do.

Internship Program Overview

Virtu's internship program offers students an extraordinary opportunity to learn about the firm and the world’s financial markets. We have built a thoughtful and challenging curriculum that introduces students to all aspects of Virtu's business through a company-curated global training week, real world trading problems to solve and engaging social events to get to know our team and culture.
10 week program, starting June 10th 2019 through August 16th 2019 (with some flexibility if needed)
A global training week to teach the basics of trading, Virtu's tools and systems, introductory programming concepts, and an overview of our different business units
Interns are paired with mentors and buddies, to help guide them through the internship
Interns can choose from a menu of projects that are assigned to different trading desks
Ongoing intern presentations throughout the program
THE QUANTITATIVE TRADING INTERNSHIP

Our Quantitative Traders are responsible for the design, operation, and improvement of high‐performance algorithmic trading strategies deployed on electronic trading venues around the world. They work closely with our quants and software engineers to enhance and further develop the firm’s trading strategies. Quantitative Traders become experts in Virtu's trading technology and its interaction with the market.

As a Quantitative Trading Intern, you'll work alongside Virtu's senior traders on a variety of exciting and challenging projects that introduce you to all the intricacies of market making. We've designed the internship to be very hands-on; interns will spend most of their time solving trading problems as they occur in the markets and working from a menu of projects with the team. Projects can come from a variety of different trading desks such as Foreign Exchange, Fixed Income, Options, ETF's, Energy and more. This is a great opportunity for the right candidate to kick start a career in the financial technology space.

Requirements

Virtu is looking for top performers. Whether you’re a coding whiz or a master of Shakespeare, we want to talk.
Excellent academic background (all majors welcome)
Outstanding quantitative problem‐solving skills and mathematical aptitude
Some programming experience is required (Python, SQL, Java or C++ are a plus)
A physicalizer; a person who identifies issues and creates solutions without rigid direction or fanfare
Highly motivated and tenacious individual, with a proven ability to take initiative and work independently and within a team
Team player: authentic, genuine person who is capable of working collective goals.
The Process

After applicants pass an initial resume screening, an online programming test will be sent via email. This test is from a service called Codility so please be on the lookout. After passing the programming test, we will contact you to arrange a phone screen.

We looking forward to meeting you!",software intern python,https://neuvoo.com/view/?tracking-details=YmlkPTAuMTImYmlkdHlwZT1jcGMmc3JjPUxpbmtlZEluKExpbWl0ZWRMaXN0aW5ncykmaklkPWY3OWI0MDZjYjY0MTBlODc5NDE4ZTFkZjhhZjYyYTVjJmVtZD0wLjAw&id=4qed5rxji8&source=joveo_bulk2&utm_source=partner&utm_medium=joveo_bulk2&puid=gddc89df1abbcaac7dabe9ae39e89ad6gad7gdd8bed3bddfgddeeed3cbdbbbddfcdc3e&oapply=org_v2018-11&abt=v1&splitab=1&action=emailAlert,New York,Quantitative Trading Internship - New York
2018-11-15,,"Job description
This is a full-time paid opportunity for the summer of 2019. The student must be able to work approximately 40 hours per week at our corporate headquarters located in downtown Buffalo. Hours can be flexible based on class schedule.

Our IT Internships Present The Following Learning Objectives
Exposure to a corporate technical environment
How to take user specifications and apply them
How to interact with a variety of people within the organization
Gain an understanding of SDLC (Software Development Life Cycle) Primary Responsibility Developer Internships
Job Duties May Include The Following
Development of functionality on initiatives that support corporate goals
Code, test, debug, maintain and implement software applications
Learn and apply development standards, methodologies, compliance and testing practices
Create technical documentation
Depending on assignment, may have exposure to Informatica, .Net development, jUnit, Java, Confluence and Jira.
Web Developer Internships

Job Duties May Include The Following
Development of functionality on initiatives that support corporate goals
Code, test, debug, maintain and implement software applications
Learn and apply development standards, methodologies, compliance and testing practices
Create technical documentation
This intern will have the opportunity to work in languages such as Java, Groovy, HTML, SQL, Cascading Style Sheets (CSS) and Native Script. They will also gain experience with the following tools/products: Adobe AEM, IntelliJ, Subversion, Sybase, Jira and Confluence.
Release Management Internships

Job Duties May Include The Following
Work on building documentation to support infrastructure projects
Build excel spreadsheets, word documents, and power point presentations to define department responsibilities
Document department assets
Build scripts to automate manual processes
Investigate source code and permissions issues in Subversion, GitLab and Confluence
Quality Test Automation Internships

Job Duties May Include The Following
Select and develop appropriate test automation tools, applying the latest techniques in test automation; e.g., data-driven testing
Work closely with development teams to triage defects and troubleshoot issues
Participate and contribute in meetings
Identify components of the system to be automated based on business priority, quality benefits, or return on investment
This intern will have the opportunity to work in languages such as Python, .NET (C#), HTML/JavaScript/CSS/Bootstrap and SQL.
They Will Also Gain Experience With The Following Tools/products
Robot Framework
Selenium
JMeter (Performance Testing)
GitLab
Docker/Kubernetes Containers
Configuration Management Database Internships

Job Duties May Include The Following
Organizing, optimizing, and enhancing existing Python scripts, Java code, and various configuration files, mostly XML, used to discover IT assets for our implementation of HPE's uCMDB (Universal Configuration Management Database).
Develop new discovery packages and deploy them to populate and integrate the CMDB with other IT systems.
Perform report generation from the CMDB and write Topology Queries (TQL) to template reusable reports, in support of a more robust and efficient reporting platform.
Organize the current framework of deployed packages, and research new libraries, plug-ins, and other tools to assist in more efficient development of discovery scripts, and integration jobs.
Assist with upgrading the current system, changing its architecture, and configuring our development, and test environments - this applies to all application and discovery servers.
Create Topology Queries (TQL) that can be used as templates to accelerate report generation, and empower consumers to generate their own reports.
Familiarity with Eclipse IDE, Notepad++, and SQL client tools preferred.
Exposure to Python, Java, SQL, Xml, and regular expressions. Familiarity with fundamental data structures and algorithms, e.g. lists, stacks, queues, result sets, hash tables/arrays, recursive methods/functions, etc. Education Student must be a junior enrolled in a 4-year program in IT. Graduate students are also encouraged to apply. Must be enrolled in a degree program for the duration of the internship. EEO Statement All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.",software intern python,https://www.linkup.com/details/113c175bb730470c0a811353f337e0b3,New York,Summer 2019 - Information Technology Internship Opportunities
2018-11-15,,"Job description
Thornton Tomasetti provides engineering design, investigation and analysis services to clients worldwide on projects of every size and level of complexity. We are a growing 1200+ person firm with practices in the following disciplines: Structural Engineering, Forensics, Applied Science, Renewal, Property Loss Consulting, Construction Engineering, Protective Design, Facade Engineering, Sustainability and Transportation. We work on landmarks to exhibitions from the historic to the high performing while balancing multiple objectives which include form, function, schedule, sustainability, constructability and budget. At our core, TALENT is the center of our business.

Some Standard Tasks Include

Thornton Tomasetti’s CORE studio consists of 18 dedicated engineers, architects, hackers and designers. CORE studio develops in-house applications for a > 1200 person global engineering consultancy, builds free software for the AEC industry, performs research in and around the AEC industry, and provides computational modeling support on projects of all sizes within TT. Increasingly, we’re also investing in machine learning research and development in and around TT’s various practices and areas of expertise. A CORE studio Data Science Intern will support this internal R&D effort, and would gain experience in generating/sourcing/cleaning data, building Machine Learning prediction models, managing large amounts of data, cloud computing, and crafting data visualizations to present insights.
Use finite element analysis, and other numerical methods to analyse and design code-compliant structural components and systems.
Use constrained multi-objective optimization, and other computational methods for design space exploration and sensitivity analysis.
Use data approximation and data interpolation techniques to fit reduced models for fast/approximate design space exploration.
Use statistical inference (Bayesian and Markov Chain Monte Carlo methods) for probabilistic design space exploration.
Prepare data visualizations to illustrate and explain analytical results.

Valuable Attributes
Excellent communication skills
Can work in a small team setting
Must have programming experience with Python
Must be pursuing a degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or a related field
Knowledge of standard machine learning and data mining algorithms
Proficiency in Finite Element Analysis (Strand7, RAM, SAP200, etc.) a plus
Understands Design Thinking
Is a problem solver and critical thinker.
Rapid Prototyping
Able to Debug/Troubleshoot

Thornton Tomasetti is proud to be an equal employment workplace. Individuals seeking employment at Thornton Tomasetti are considered without regards to age, ancestry, color, gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, mental or physical disability, national origin, protected family care or medical leave status, race, religion (including beliefs and practices or the absence thereof), sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws.",software intern python,https://neuvoo.com/view/?tracking-details=YmlkPTAuMTAmYmlkdHlwZT1jcGMmc3JjPUxpbmtlZEluKExpbWl0ZWRMaXN0aW5ncykmaklkPTY3ZDBmNDFiNzVkMjYwMTZiZWE2MDk3ZWQyY2Y0ZTZmJmVtZD0wLjAw&id=mjcb394vbh&source=joveo_bulk2&utm_source=partner&utm_medium=joveo_bulk2&puid=gad38ad61abdcaae7dadeda73dec99dagadegad8bed3bddfgddgeed3cbdbbbddfcdc3e&oapply=org_v2018-11&abt=v1&splitab=1&action=emailAlert,New York,CORE studio Data Science Intern - New York
